Mind in Life
BIOLOGY, PHENOMENOLOGY,
AND THE SCIENCES OF MIND
◆ ◆ ◆
Evan Thompson
THE BELKNAP PRESS OF
HARVARD UNIVERSITY PRESS
Cambridge, Massachusetts
London, England
Copyright © 2007 by the President and Fellows of Harvard College
All rights reserved
Printed in the United States of America
First Harvard University Press paperback edition, 2010
Library of Congress Cataloging-in-Publication Data
Thompson, Evan.
Mind in life : biology, phenomenology, and the sciences of mind / Evan Thompson.
To
Gabriel Cohen Varela
Maximilian Todd Williams
Gareth Todd Thompson
Preface ix
Acknowledgments xi
PART ONE The Enactive Approach 1
ONE Cognitive Science and Human Experience 3
TWO The Phenomenological Connection 16
THREE Autonomy and Emergence 37
FOUR The Structure of Behavior 66
PART TWO Life in Mind 89
FIVE Autopoiesis: The Organization of the Living 91
SIX Life and Mind: The Philosophy of the Organism 128
SEVEN Laying Down a Path in Walking: 
Development and Evolution 166
Contents
PART THREE Consciousness in Life 219
EIGHT Life beyond the Gap 221
NINE Sensorimotor Subjectivity 243
TEN Look Again: Consciousness and Mental Imagery 267
ELEVEN Temporality and the Living Present 312
TWELVE Primordial Dynamism: Emotion and Valence 360
THIRTEEN Empathy and Enculturation 382
APPENDIX A: Husserl and Cognitive Science 413
APPENDIX B: Emergence and the Problem of
Downward Causation 417
Notes 443
References 483
Index 527
viii Contents
Preface
THE THEME OF THIS BOOK is the deep continuity of life and mind.
Where there is life there is mind, and mind in its most articulated forms
belongs to life. Life and mind share a core set of formal or organizational properties, and the formal or organizational properties distinctive of mind are an enriched version of those fundamental to life. More
precisely, the self-organizing features of mind are an enriched version of
the self-organizing features of life. The self-producing or “autopoietic”
organization of biological life already implies cognition, and this incipient mind finds sentient expression in the self-organizing dynamics of
action, perception, and emotion, as well as in the self-moving flow of
time-consciousness.
From this perspective, mental life is also bodily life and is situated in
the world. The roots of mental life lie not simply in the brain, but
ramify through the body and environment. Our mental lives involve
our body and the world beyond the surface membrane of our organism, and therefore cannot be reduced simply to brain processes inside the head.
The chapters to come elaborate these ideas using material drawn
from three main sources—biology, phenomenological philosophy,
and psychology and neuroscience. The book as a whole is intended to
bring the experimental sciences of life and mind into a closer and
more harmonious relationship with phenomenological investigations
of experience and subjectivity.
The principal motive behind this aim is to make headway on one of
x Preface
the outstanding philosophical and scientific problems of our time—
the so-called explanatory gap between consciousness and nature. Exactly how are consciousness and subjective experience related to the
brain and body? It is one thing to be able to establish correlations between consciousness and brain activity; it is another thing to have an
account that explains exactly how certain biological processes generate and realize consciousness and subjectivity. At the present time,
we not only lack such an account, but also are unsure about the form it
would need to have in order to bridge the conceptual and epistemological gap between life and mind as objects of scientific investigation,
and life and mind as we subjectively experience them.
In this book, I offer no new or original theory or model of consciousness, no new conceptual analysis of physical and phenomenal
concepts, and no new speculative metaphysical synthesis to unify consciousness and nature. My aim and approach are different. To make
real progress on the explanatory gap, we need richer phenomenological accounts of the structure of experience, and we need scientific accounts of mind and life informed by these phenomenological accounts. Phenomenology in turn needs to be informed by psychology,
neuroscience, and biology. My aim is not to close the explanatory gap
in a reductive sense, but rather to enlarge and enrich the philosophical and scientific resources we have for addressing the gap. My approach is thus to bring phenomenological analyses of experience into
a mutually illuminating relationship with scientific analyses of life and
mind.
Acknowledgments
I CANNOT HELP but think of this book as exemplifying what philosophers call the bundle theory of personal identity. According to the
bundle theory, there is no single and permanent self that persists
through time; the self is rather a bundle of constantly changing and
psychologically continuous experiences or mental episodes. Similarly, this book began many years ago and has undergone so many
transformations since its inception that I cannot say with any confi-
dence that it is the “same” book I started work on more than ten
years ago.
Originally, this book (or its textual ancestor) was supposed to be coauthored with Francisco Varela. We had hoped to write a follow-up to
our book (co-authored with Eleanor Rosch), The Embodied Mind: Cognitive Science and Human Experience (MIT Press, 1991). When we began
planning our new book (in 1994), Francisco had just learned that he
was chronically ill with Hepatitis C. Thus, from the beginning, a sense
of urgency lay over this book. Eventually it became clear that Francisco
would need a liver transplant. At this time (in 1998), Francisco decided to step back from the project and encouraged me to continue
on my own. I thus set about to revise the book by myself. After the success of the transplant, Francisco felt new enthusiasm for the project,
and we tried to resume our collaborative efforts. Sadly, his illness returned not long afterward, and Francisco died on May 28, 2001, at his
home in Paris. The obituary I wrote a few days later for the online
journal Psyche can be read at: http://psyche.cs.monash.edu.au/v7/
xii Acknowledgments
An abridged version was also published in
Journal of Consciousness Studies 8 (2001): 66–69.
After Francisco’s death, I tried to continue writing this book as a coauthored one. But there was still a large amount of writing to be done,
and as time passed it became clear that the book needed to be completely recast and rewritten by me alone. I reorganized and rewrote
the chapters, and changed the title twice, before the book finally took
its present form. Thus, although the enormous influence of Francisco’s thought will be evident to anyone who reads this book, I bear
full responsibility for this work’s contents, and all shortcomings and
errors are mine.
Over the long and difficult time it has taken to produce this book, I
have had the support and encouragement of many people.
No one has given me more encouragement, aid, and love, and
shared more in the tumultuous life of this book, than Rebecca Todd.
The love and gratitude I feel are beyond expression. In addition to
living with my long periods of self-absorption while struggling with this
book, she has read numerous drafts and helped me improve my
thinking and writing immeasurably. I cannot imagine having written
this book without her.
Our sons Maximilian Todd Williams and Gareth Todd Thompson
have had to endure my working on this book for almost their entire
lives. My gratitude to them is boundless. I dedicate this book to them,
and to our dear family friend, Gabriel Cohen Varela, son of Francisco
Varela and Amy Cohen Varela, and the same age as my younger son.
Gail Thompson, William Irwin Thompson, and Hilary Thompson
have given great support in ways too numerous to detail. I am deeply
grateful to them.
I also express deep thanks to John and Nancy Todd for their encouragement over many years.
Amy Cohen Varela’s enthusiasm for this book, and her unhesitating
support and encouragement when I decided to transform it into a
single-authored work after Francisco’s death, are deeply appreciated.
Alva Noë’s friendship and intellectual companionship during the
writing of this book are greatly valued. I express my gratitude to him
also for comments on early versions of several chapters, and for his
reading and commenting on the penultimate version of the entire
manuscript.
Acknowledgments xiii
Many people over the years have read various portions of this book
and given helpful advice along the way: Giovanna Colombetti, Diego
Cosmelli, Isabela Granic, Robert Hanna, Marc Lewis, Antoine Lutz,
Susan Oyama, Michael Silberstein, Dan Zahavi, and Phil Zelazo.
For helpful discussions on a wide variety of topics related to this
book, I thank Lisa Adams, Ralph Adolphs, Michel Bitbol, Maria
Botero, Paul Bourgine, Richie Davidson, Natalie Depraz, Jean-Pierre
Dupuy, Frans de Waal, Adam Engle, Michel Ferrari, Shaun Gallagher,
Vittorio Gallese, Tom Hollenstein, Evelyn Fox Keller, Uriah Kriegel,
Jean-Philippe Lachaux, Connie Lamm, Alex Lamey, Dorothée
Legrand, Michel Le Van Quyen, Luigi Luisi, Jun Luo, Eduard Marbach, Barry McMullin, Bernard Pachoud, Slobodan Perovic, Claire Petitmengin, Jean Petitot, Ljiljana Radenovic, Franz Reichle, Eugenio
Rodriguez, Andreas Roepstorff, Jean-Michel Roy, David Rudrauf,
Brian Cantwell Smith, John Stewart, Steve Torrence, Joel Walmsley,
Mark Wexler, and Arthur Zajonc.
The penultimate version of this book served as the main text for a
graduate seminar in “Phenomenological Philosophy of Mind” I taught
during the Fall Term 2005, in the Department of Philosophy at the
University of Toronto. I am grateful to everyone who attended that
seminar—especially Ranpal Dosanjh, David Egan, Cathal Ó Madagáin,
Joshua Ben Nichols, Adrienne Prettyman, and Joel Walmsley—for
their critical responses to the text.
Helena De Preester, at short notice, read the penultimate version of
the text and sent me numerous detailed and insightful comments that
helped my final revisions considerably.
Mike Wheeler also read the entire manuscript and helpfully called
attention to several places where my arguments could be improved.
I am particularly thankful for the patience of Lindsay Waters at the
Harvard University Press. His encouragement and speedy efficiency
when the manuscript finally arrived on his desk are much appreciated.
I am grateful to several institutions and individuals for their support.
During March and April 2003, I stayed as a visting Mâitre de Recherche
at the Centre de Recherche en Epistémologie Appliqué (CREA), at the
Ecole Polytechnique, Paris. I wish to thank its director, Jean Petitot, for
this opportunity, which greatly aided me in writing this book. I also
thank Dan Zahavi, director of the Center for Subjectivity Research at
the University of Copenhagen, for inviting me to visit for two weeks in
xiv Acknowledgments
June 2004 and June 2005, and for numerous productive exchanges
during this time. Finally, I am grateful to the McDonnell Project in Philosophy and the Neurosciences, its director, Kathleen Akins, and my
fellow project members, for their interest in and support of my work.
For financial support, I am grateful to the Social Sciences and Humanities Research Council of Canada for a Standard Research Grant
(1998–2001) and a Canada Research Chair (2002–2007); York University for a Faculty of Arts Research Fellowship (2001–2002); the McDonnell Project in Philosophy and Neuroscience; the Center for Consciousness Studies at the University of Arizona, Tucson; and the
University of Toronto for a Connaught Start-up Research Award.
An earlier version of Chapter 9 was published as the article “Sensorimotor Subjectivity and the Enactive Approach to Experience,” in Phenomenology and the Cognitive Sciences 4 (2005): 407–427 (© SpringerVerlag). Chapter 10 is an expanded version of “Look Again:
Phenomenology and Mental Imagery,” in Phenomenology and the Cognitive Sciences (in press; © Springer-Verlag), and of “Representationalism
and the Phenomenology of Mental Imagery,” in Synthese (in press; ©
Springer-Verlag). I am grateful to the editor of these journals for permission to use this material in revised form here.
Finally, I am grateful to my former colleagues at York University and
my new colleagues at the University of Toronto for their encouragement and interest in my work.
PART ONE
◆
The Enactive Approach
ONE
◆ ◆ ◆
Cognitive Science and Human Experience
COGNITIVE SCIENCE—that part of the science of the mind traditionally concerned with cognitive processes—has been described as having
“a very long past but a relatively short history” (Gardner 1985, p. 9).
Scientific concern with the mind can be traced all the way back to
Plato and Aristotle, but the term cognitive science did not arise until the
late twentieth century, as a name for the new, modern, scientific research progam that integrated psychology, neuroscience, linguistics,
computer science, artificial intelligence (AI), and philosophy. What
united these disciplines, and set cognitive science apart from earlier
approaches in psychology and philosophy, was the goal of making explicit the principles and mechanisms of cognition. Cognitive science,
in providing a whole new array of concepts, models, and experimental
techniques, claimed to be able to provide rigorous scientific knowledge of the mind beyond what earlier forms of psychology and philosophy had offered.
In recent years, however, it has become increasingly clear to many
researchers that cognitive science is incomplete. Cognitive science has
focused on cognition while neglecting emotion, affect, and motivation
(LeDoux 2002, p. 24). In addition, a complete science of the mind
needs to account for subjectivity and consciousness.
With hindsight it has also become evident that, in the passage from
traditional philosophy and psychology to modern-day cognitive science, something was lost that only now is beginning to be reclaimed.
What was lost, in a nutshell, was scientific concern with subjective ex-
3
4 The Enactive Approach
perience. In 1892 William James quoted with approval George Trumball Ladd’s definition of psychology “as the description and explanation of states of consciousness as such” (James 1985, p. xxv; emphasis
omitted). Consciousness was supposed to be the subject matter of psychology, yet cognitive science has had virtually nothing to say about it
until recent years. To understand this neglect we need to consider the
development of cognitive science since the 1950s.
Three major approaches to the study of the mind can be distinguished within cognitive science—cognitivism, connectionism, and
embodied dynamicism. Each approach has its preferred theoretical
metaphor for understanding the mind. For cognitivism, the metaphor
is the mind as digital computer; for connectionism, it is the mind as
neural network; for embodied dynamicism, it is the mind as an embodied dynamic system. Cognitivism dominated the field from the
1950s to the 1970s. In the 1980s, connectionism began to challenge
the cognitivist orthodoxy, followed in the 1990s by embodied dynamicism. In contemporary research, all three approaches coexist, both
separately and in various hybrid forms.1
Cognitivism
Cognitive science came into being in the 1950s with the “cognitive revolution” against behaviorist psychology. At the center of this revolution
was the computer model of mind, now known as the classical conception of cognitive processes. According to this classical model, cognition is information processing after the fashion of the digital computer. Behaviorism had allowed no reference to internal states of the
organism; explanations of behavior had to be formulated in terms of
sensory stimuli and behavioral conditioning (on the input side), and
overt behavioral response (on the output side). The computer model
of the mind not only made reference to internal states legitimate, but
also showed it to be necessary in accounting for the behavior of complex information processing systems. Even more important, the computer model was taken to show how content or meaning could be attributed to states inside the system. A computer is supposed to be a
symbol-manipulating machine.2 A symbol is an item that has a physical
shape or form, and that stands for or represents something. According
to the computer model of the mind, the brain, too, is a computer, a
Cognitive Science and Human Experience 5
“physical symbol system,” and mental processes are carried out by the
manipulation of symbolic representations in the brain (Newell and
Simon 1976; Pylyshyn 1984). A typical cognitivist model takes the form
of a program for solving a problem in some domain. Nonsymbolic sensory inputs are transduced and mapped onto symbolic representations
of the task domain. These representations are then manipulated in a
purely formal or syntactic fashion in order to arrive at a solution to the
problem. Cognitivist explanations focus on the abstract problemsolving characterization of cognitive tasks, the structure and content of
symbolic representations, and the nature of the algorithms for manipulating the representations in order to solve a given problem. Cognitivism goes hand in hand with functionalism in the philosophy of
mind, which in its extreme computational form holds that the embodiment of the organism is essentially irrelevant to the nature of the
mind. It is the software, not the hardware, that matters most for mentality.
Cognitivism made meaning, in the sense of representational semantics, scientifically acceptable, but at the price of banishing consciousness from the science of the mind. (In fact, cognitivism inherited its
consciousness taboo directly from behaviorism.) Mental processes, understood to be computations made by the brain using an inner symbolic language, were taken to be entirely nonconscious. Thus the connection between mind and meaning, on the one hand, and subjectivity
and consciousness, on the other, was completely severed.
Long before cognitivism, Freud had already undermined any simplistic identification of mind and consciousness. According to his early
model, the psyche is composed of three systems, which he called the
conscious, the preconscious, and the unconscious (Freud 1915, pp.
159–222). The conscious corresponds to the field of awareness, and
the preconscious to what we can recall but are not aware of now. The
unconscious, in contrast, Freud considered to be part of our phylogenetic heritage. It is thoroughly somatic and affective, and its contents
have been radically separated from consciousness by repression and
cannot enter the conscious–preconscious system without distortion.
(Later, Freud introduced a new structural model composed of the ego,
id, and superego; see Freud 1923, pp. 339–407.)
The cognitivist separation of cognition and consciousness, however,
was different from Freud’s model. Mental processes, according to cog-
6 The Enactive Approach
nitivism, are “subpersonal routines,” which by nature are completely
inaccessible to personal awareness under any conditions. The mind
was divided into two radically different regions, with an unbridgeable
chasm between them—the subjective mental states of the person and
the subpersonal cognitive routines implemented in the brain. The radically nonconscious, subpersonal region, the so-called cognitive unconscious, is where the action of thought really happens; personal
awareness has access merely to a few results or epiphenomenal manifestations of subpersonal processing (Jackendoff 1987). Thought corresponds to nonconscious, skull-bound, symbol manipulation. It takes
place in a central cognitive module of the brain separate from the systems for perception, emotion, and motor action. The cognitive unconscious is neither somatic nor affective, and it is lodged firmly within
the head.
This radical separation of cognitive processes from consciousness
created a peculiar “explanatory gap” in scientific theorizing about the
mind.3 Cartesian dualism had long ago created an explanatory gap between mind and matter, consciousness and nature. Cognitivism, far
from closing this gap, perpetuated it in a materialist form by opening a
new gap between subpersonal, computational cognition and subjective
mental phenomena. Simply put, cognitivism offered no account whatsoever of mentality in the sense of subjective experience. Some theorists even went so far as to claim that subjectivity and consciousness do
not fall within the province of cognitive science (Pylyshyn 1984). Not
all theorists shared this view, however. A notable exception was Ray
Jackendoff, who clearly formulated the problem facing cognitivism in
his 1987 book Consciousness and the Computational Mind. According to
Jackendoff, cognitivism, in radically differentiating computational cognition from subjective experience, produced a new “mind-mind”
problem, in addition to the classical mind-body problem. The mindmind problem is the problem of the relation between the computational mind and the phenomenological mind, between subpersonal,
computational, cognitive processes and conscious experience ( Jackendoff 1987, p. 20). Thanks to cognitivism, a new set of mind-body
problems had to be faced:
1. The phenomenological mind-body problem: How can a brain
have experiences?
Cognitive Science and Human Experience 7
2. The computational mind-body problem: How can a brain accomplish reasoning?
3. The mind-mind problem: What is the relation between computational states and experience?
Each problem is a variant of the explanatory gap. The cognitivist
metaphor of the mind as computer, which was meant to solve the computational mind-body problem, thus came at the cost of creating a new
problem, the mind-mind problem. This problem is a version of what is
now known as the “hard problem of consciousness” (Chalmers 1996;
Nagel 1974).
During the heyday of cognitivism in the 1970s and early 1980s, cognitivists liked to proclaim that their view was “the only game in town”
(Fodor 1975, 1981), and they insisted that the computer model of the
mind is not a metaphor but a scientific theory (Pylyshyn 1984), unlike
earlier mechanistic models, such as the brain as a telephone switchboard. The cognitive anthropologist Edwin Hutchins (1995), however,
has argued that a confused metaphorical transference from culture to
individual psychology lies at the very origin of the cognitivist view. Cognitivism derives from taking what is in fact a sociocultural activity—
human computation—and projecting it onto something that goes on
inside the individual’s head. The cognitive properties of computation
do not belong to the individual person but to the sociocultural system
of individual-plus-environment.
The original model of a computational system was a person—a
mathematician or logician manipulating symbols with hands and eyes,
and pen and paper. (The word “computer” originally meant “one who
computes.”) This kind of physical symbol system is a sophisticated and
culturally specific form of human activity. It is embodied, requiring
perception and motor action, and embedded in a sociocultural environment of symbolic cognition and technology. It is not bounded by
the skull or skin but extends into the environment. The environment,
for its part, plays a necessary and active role in the cognitive processes
themselves; it is not a mere contingent, external setting (Clark and
Chalmers 1998; Wilson 1994). Nevertheless, the human mind is able to
idealize and conceptualize computation in the abstract as the mechanical application of formal rules to symbol strings, as Alan Turing did in
arriving at his mathematical notion of a Turing Machine. Turing suc-
8 The Enactive Approach
cessfully abstracted away from both the world in which the mathematician computes and the psychological processes he or she uses to perform a computation. But what do such abstract formal systems reflect
or correspond to in the real world? According to the cognitivist “creation myth,” what Turing succeeded in capturing was the bare essentials of intelligent thought or cognition within the individual (all the
rest being mere implementation details).
The problem with this myth is that real human computation—the
original source domain for conceptualizing computation in the abstract—was never simply an internal psychological process; it was a 
sociocultural activity as well. Computation, in other words, never re-
flected simply the cognitive properties of the individual, but instead
those of the sociocultural system in which the individual is embedded.
Therefore, when one abstracts away from the situated individual what
remains is precisely not the bare essentials of individual cognition, but
rather the bare essentials of the sociocultural system: “The physicalsymbol-system architecture is not a model of individual cognition. It is
a model of the operation of a sociocultural system from which the
human actor has been removed” (Hutchins 1995, p. 363; emphasis
omitted). Whether abstract computation is well suited to model the
structure of thought processes within the individual is therefore questionable. Nevertheless, cognitivism, instead of realizing that its computer programs reproduced (or extended) the abstract properties of
the sociocultural system, projected the physical-symbol-system model
onto the brain. Because cognitivism from its inception abstracted away
from culture, society, and embodiment, it remained resistant to this
kind of critical analysis and was wedded to a reified metaphor of the
mind as a computer in the head.4
The connectionist challenge to cognitivism, however, did not take
the form of this kind of critique. Rather, connectionist criticism focused on the neurological implausibility of the physical-symbol-system
model and various perceived deficiencies of symbol processing compared with neural networks (McLelland, Rummelhart, and the PDP
Research Group 1986; Smolensky 1988).
Connectionism
Connectionism arose in the early 1980s, revising and revitalizing ideas
from the precognitivist era of cybernetics.5 Connectionism is now
Cognitive Science and Human Experience 9
widespread. Its central metaphor of the mind is the neural network.
Connectionist models of cognitive processes take the form of artificial
neural networks, which are virtual systems run on a digital computer.
An artificial neural network is composed of layers of many simple
neuron-like units that are linked together by numerically weighted
connections. The connection strengths change according to various
learning rules and the system’s history of activity.
The network is trained to convert numerical (rather than symbolic)
input representations into numerical output representations. Given
appropriate input and training, the network converges toward some
particular cognitive performance, such as producing speech sounds
from written text (as in the famous NETtalk system of Sejnowski and
Rosenberg 1986), or categorizing words according to their lexical role
(Elman 1991). Such cognitive performances correspond to emergent
patterns of activity in the network. These patterns are not symbols in
the traditional computational sense, although they are supposed to be
approximately describable in symbolic terms (Smolensky 1988). Connectionist explanations focus on the architecture of the neural network (units, layers, and connections), the learning rules, and the distributed subsymbolic representations that emerge from the network’s
activity. According to connectionism, artificial neural networks capture the abstract cognitive properties of neural networks in the brain
and provide a better model of the cognitive architecture of the mind
than the physical symbol systems of cognitivism.
The connectionist movement of the 1980s emphasized perceptual
pattern recognition as the paradigm of intelligence, in contrast to deductive reasoning, emphasized by cognitivism. Whereas cognitivism
firmly lodged the mind within the head, connectionism offered a
more dynamic conception of the relation between cognitive processes
and the environment. For example, connectionists hypothesized that
the structural properties of sequential reasoning and linguistic cognition arise not from manipulations of symbols in the brain, but from
the dynamic interaction of neural networks with symbolic resources in
the external environment, such as diagrams, numerical symbols, and
natural language (Rummelhart et al. 1986).
Despite these advances, connectionist systems did not involve any
sensory and motor coupling with the environment, but instead operated on the basis of artificial inputs and outputs (set initially by the designer of the system). Connectionism also inherited from cognitivism
10 The Enactive Approach
the idea that cognition is basically the solving of predefined problems
(posed to the system from outside by the observer or designer) and
that the mind is essentially the skull-bound cognitive unconscious, the
subpersonal domain of computational representation in the mindbrain. Connectionism’s disagreement with cognitivism was over the
nature of computation and representation (symbolic for cognitivists,
subsymbolic for connectionists).
With regard to the problem of the explanatory gap, connectionism
enlarged the scope of the computational mind but provided little, if
any, new resources for addressing the gap between the computational
mind and the phenomenological mind. Subjectivity still had no place
in the sciences of mind, and the explanatory gap remained unaddressed.
Embodied Dynamicism
The third approach, embodied dynamicism, arose in the 1990s and involved a critical stance toward computationalism in either its cognitivist or connectionist form.6 Cognitivism and connectionism left unquestioned the relation between cognitive processes and the real
world. As a result, their models of cognition were disembodied and abstract. On the one hand, cognitive processes were said to be instantiated (or realized or implemented) in the brain, with little thought
given to what such a notion could mean, given the biological facts of
the brain and its relationship to the living body of the organism and to
the environment. On the other hand, the relationship between the
mind and the world was assumed to be one of abstract representation:
symbolic or subsymbolic representations in the mind-brain stand for
states of affairs in some restricted outside domain that has been speci-
fied in advance and independently of the cognitive system. The mind
and the world were thus treated as separate and independent of each
other, with the outside world mirrored by a representational model inside the head. Embodied dynamicism called into question all of these
assumptions, in particular the conception of cognition as disembodied
and abstract mental representation. Like connectionism, embodied
dynamicism focuses on self-organizing dynamic systems rather than
physical symbol systems (connectionist networks are examples of selforganizing dynamic systems), but maintains in addition that cognitive
Cognitive Science and Human Experience 11
processes emerge from the nonlinear and circular causality of continuous sensorimotor interactions involving the brain, body, and environment. The central metaphor for this approach is the mind as embodied dynamic system in the world, rather than the mind as neural
network in the head.
As its name suggests, embodied dynamicism combines two main theoretical commitments. One commitment is to a dynamic systems approach to cognition, and the other is to an embodied approach to cognition.
The central idea of the dynamic systems approach is that cognition is
an intrinsically temporal phenomenon and accordingly needs to be understood from the perspective of dynamic systems theory (Port and van
Gelder 1995; van Gelder 1998). A dynamic systems model takes the form
of a set of evolution equations that describe how the state of the system
changes over time. The collection of all possible states of the system corresponds to the system’s “state space” or “phase space,” and the ways that
the system changes state correspond to trajectories in this space.
Dynamic-system explanations focus on the internal and external forces
that shape such trajectories as they unfold in time. Inputs are described
as perturbations to the system’s intrinsic dynamics, rather than as instructions to be followed, and internal states are described as selforganized compensations triggered by perturbations, rather than as representations of external states of affairs.
The central idea of the embodied approach is that cognition is the exercise of skillful know-how in situated and embodied action (Varela,
Thompson, and Rosch 1991). Cognitive structures and processes emerge
from recurrent sensorimotor patterns that govern perception and action
in autonomous and situated agents. Cognition as skillful know-how is not
reducible to prespecified problem solving, because the cognitive system
both poses the problems and specifies what actions need to be taken for
their solution.
Strictly speaking, dynamicism and embodiment are logically independent theoretical commitments. For example, dynamical connectionism incorporates dynamicist ideas into artificial neural networks
(see Port and van Gelder 1995, pp. 32–34), whereas autonomous
agents research in robotics incorporates embodiment ideas without
employing dynamic systems theory (Maes 1990). Nevertheless, dynamicism and embodiment go well together and are intimately related for
12 The Enactive Approach
many theorists. As Randall Beer notes: “Although a dynamical approach can certainly stand alone, it is most powerful and distinctive
when coupled with a situated, embodied perspective on cognition”
(Beer 2000, p. 97).
Embodied dynamicism provides a different perspective on the cognitive unconscious from computationalism. No longer is the cognitive
unconscious seen as disembodied symbol manipulation or pattern
recognition separate from emotion and motor action in the world. Instead, the cognitive unconscious consists of those processes of embodied and embedded cognition and emotion that cannot be made
experientially accessible to the person. This characterization of the
cognitive unconscious is offered not as a hypothetical construct in an
abstract functionalist model of the mind, but rather as a provisional indication of a large problem-space in our attempt to understand
human cognition.
At least four points need emphasizing in this context. First, as a conceptual matter, the relations among what is nonconscious, unconscious, preconscious, and conscious (in any of the innumerable senses
of these words)—or in a different, but not equivalent idiom, what is
subpersonal and personal—remain far from clear. Second, as an empirical matter, the scope and limits of awareness of one’s own psychological and somatic processes have yet to be clearly mapped and undoubtedly vary across subjects. Third, the key point still stands that
most of what we are as psychological and biological beings is in some
sense unconscious. It follows that subjectivity cannot be understood
without situating it in relation to these unconscious structures and processes. Finally, these unconscious structures and processes, including
those describable as cognitive and emotional, extend throughout the
body and loop through the material, social, and cultural environments
in which the body is embedded; they are not limited to neural processes inside the skull.
The emergence of embodied dynamicism in the 1990s coincided
with a revival of scientific and philosophical interest in consciousness,
together with a renewed willingness to address the explanatory gap between scientific accounts of cognitive processes and human subjectivity
and experience. A number of works on embodied cognition were explicitly concerned with experience and challenged the objectivist assumptions of computationalism.7 Some of these works were also ex-
Cognitive Science and Human Experience 13
plicitly dynamical in orientation.8 In particular, the enactive approach
of Varela, Thompson, and Rosch (1991) aimed to build bridges between embodied dynamicist accounts of the mind and phenomenological accounts of human subjectivity and experience. The present
book continues this project.
The Enactive Approach
Enaction means the action of enacting a law, but it also connotes the
performance or carrying out of an action more generally. Borrowing
the words of the poet Antonio Machado, Varela described enaction
as the laying down of a path in walking: “Wanderer the road is your
footsteps, nothing else; you lay down a path in walking” (Varela 1987,
p. 63).
The term the enactive approach and the associated concept of enaction were introduced into cognitive science by Varela, Thompson, and
Rosch (1991) in their book The Embodied Mind. They aimed to unify
under one heading several related ideas. The first idea is that living beings are autonomous agents that actively generate and maintain themselves, and thereby also enact or bring forth their own cognitive domains. The second idea is that the nervous system is an autonomous
dynamic system: It actively generates and maintains its own coherent
and meaningful patterns of activity, according to its operation as a circular and reentrant network of interacting neurons. The nervous
system does not process information in the computationalist sense, but
creates meaning. The third idea is that cognition is the exercise of
skillful know-how in situated and embodied action. Cognitive structures and processes emerge from recurrent sensorimotor patterns of
perception and action. Sensorimotor coupling between organism and
environment modulates, but does not determine, the formation of endogenous, dynamic patterns of neural activity, which in turn inform
sensorimotor coupling. The fourth idea is that a cognitive being’s
world is not a prespecified, external realm, represented internally by
its brain, but a relational domain enacted or brought forth by that
being’s autonomous agency and mode of coupling with the environment. The fifth idea is that experience is not an epiphenomenal side
issue, but central to any understanding of the mind, and needs to be
investigated in a careful phenomenological manner. For this reason,
14 The Enactive Approach
the enactive approach maintains that mind science and phenomenological investigations of human experience need to be pursued in a
complementary and mutually informing way.9
The conviction motivating the present book is that the enactive approach offers important resources for making progress on the explanatory gap. One key point is that the enactive approach explicates
selfhood and subjectivity from the ground up by accounting for the autonomy proper to living and cognitive beings. The burden of this book
is to show that this approach to subjectivity is a fruitful one.
To make headway on this project, we need to draw from biology,
neuroscience, psychology, philosophy, and phenomenology. In this
book, I try to integrate investigations from all these fields.
One common thread running through the following chapters is a reliance on the philosophical tradition of phenomenology, inaugurated
by Edmund Husserl and developed in various directions by numerous
others, most notably for my purposes by Maurice Merleau-Ponty
(Moran 2000; Sokolowski 2000; Spiegelberg 1994).10 My aim, however,
is not to repeat this tradition’s analyses, as they are found in this or that
author or text, but to present them anew in light of present-day concerns in the sciences of mind. Thus this book can be seen as contributing to the work of a new generation of phenomenologists who
strive to “naturalize” phenomenology (Petitot et al. 1999). The project
of naturalizing phenomenology can be understood in different ways,
and my own way of thinking about it will emerge later in this book. The
basic idea for the moment is that it is not enough for phenomenology
simply to describe and philosophically analyze lived experience; phenomenology needs to be able to understand and interpret its investigations in relation to those of biology and mind science.
Yet mind science has much to learn from the analyses of lived experience accomplished by phenomenologists. Indeed, once science
turns its attention to subjectivity and consciousness, to experience as it
is lived, then it cannot do without phenomenology, which thus needs
to be recognized and cultivated as an indispensable partner to the experimental sciences of mind and life. As we will see, this scientific turn
to phenomenology leads as much to a renewed understanding of nature, life, and mind as to a naturalization of phenomenology (Zahavi
2004b).
There is also a deeper convergence of the enactive approach and
Cognitive Science and Human Experience 15
phenomenology that is worth summarizing briefly here. Both share a
view of the mind as having to constitute its objects. Here constitution
does not mean fabrication or creation; the mind does not fabricate the
world. “To constitute,” in the technical phenomenological sense,
means to bring to awareness, to present, or to disclose. The mind
brings things to awareness; it discloses and presents the world. Stated
in a classical phenomenological way, the idea is that objects are disclosed or made available to experience in the ways they are thanks to
the intentional activities of consciousness. Things show up, as it were,
having the features they do, because of how they are disclosed and
brought to awareness by the intentional activities of our minds. Such
constitution is not apparent to us in everyday life but requires systematic analysis to disclose. Consider our experience of time (discussed in
Chapter 11). Our sense of the present moment as both simultaneously
opening into the immediate future and slipping away into the immediate past depends on the formal structure of our consciousness of
time. The present moment manifests as a zone or span of actuality, instead of as an instantaneous flash, thanks to the way our consciousness
is structured. As we will see later, the present moment also manifests
this way because of the nonlinear dynamics of brain activity. Weaving
together these two types of analysis, the phenomenological and neurobiological, in order to bridge the gap between subjective experience
and biology, defines the aim of neurophenomenology (Varela 1996),
an offshoot of the enactive approach.
The enactive approach and phenomenology also meet on the
common ground of life or living being. For the enactive approach, autonomy is a fundamental characteristic of biological life, and there is a
deep continuity of life and mind. For phenomenology, intentionality is
a fundamental characteristic of the lived body. The enactive approach
and phenomenology thus converge on the proposition that subjectivity and consciousness have to be explicated in relation to the autonomy and intentionality of life, in a full sense of “life” that encompasses, as we will see, the organism, one’s subjectively lived body, and
the life-world.
It will take some work before these ideas can stand clearly before us
in this book. In the next chapter I introduce phenomenological philosophy in more detail, before returning to the enactive approach in
Chapter 3.
TWO
◆ ◆ ◆
The Phenomenological Connection
THIS CHAPTER INTRODUCES a number of themes from phenomenological philosophy that will appear throughout this book. Phenomenology is important here for two main reasons. First, any attempt to
gain a comprehensive understanding of the human mind must at
some point consider consciousness and subjectivity—how thinking,
perceiving, acting, and feeling are experienced in one’s own case.
Mental events do not occur in a vacuum; they are lived by someone.
Phenomenology is anchored to the careful description, analysis, and
interpretation of lived experience. Second, the enactive approach
puts the organism and the body center-stage in mind science, but the
human body, unless it is dead, is always the lived body. Phenomenology, in one of its strongest currents flowing from Husserl and
Merleau-Ponty, is a philosophy of the lived body. For these reasons,
phenomenology can guide and clarify scientific research on subjectivity and consciousness, and provide a philosophical framework for
assessing the meaning and significance of this research for our selfunderstanding.
This chapter has two purposes. First, it introduces some core ideas
of Husserl’s phenomenology, in particular the phenomenological
method of investigating the structure of experience, known as the phenomenological reduction, and the phenomenological concept of intentionality. Second, it sketches three phases of phenomenology,
known as static, genetic, and generative phenomenology.
Static phenomenology analyzes the formal structures of conscious-
16
The Phenomenological Connection 17
ness, whereby consciousness is able to constitute (disclose or bring to
awareness) its objects. Static phenomenology takes these intentional
structures and their correlative objects as given and analyzes them statically or synchronically.
Genetic phenomenology is concerned with how these intentional
structures and objects emerge through time; therefore, it cannot take
them as given. Instead, it analyzes how certain types of experience motivate later and more complex types—for example, how implicit and
prereflective experiences motivate attentive and reflective experiences. From the perspective of genetic phenomenology, experience
has a sedimented structure, and the process of sedimentation needs to
be understood in relation to the lived body and time-consciousness.
Some of the key guiding phenomena for genetic phenomenology—affect, motivation, attention, habit—are familiar from the perspective of
mind science, especially developmental psychology, emotion theory,
and affective-cognitive neuroscience. These points of convergence and
mutual illumination will be taken up in later chapters.
Whereas time-consciousness and the lived body are the guiding
threads for genetic phenomenology, for generative phenomenology
the guiding thread is the life-world. The subject matter of generative
phenomenology is the cultural, historical, and intersubjective constitution of our human world. The importance of generative phenomenology for mind science and the enactive approach in particular will
be taken up in the last chapter of this book.
Phenomenology with an Attitude
Phenomenology, in its original Husserlian inspiration, grows out of
the recognition that we can adopt in our own first-person case
different mental attitudes or stances toward the world, life, and experience. In everyday life we are usually straightforwardly immersed in various situations and projects, whether as specialists in scientific, technical, or practical knowledge or as colleagues, friends, and members of
families and communities. Besides being directed toward these moreor-less particular, “thematic” matters, we are also directed at the world
as an unthematic horizon of all our activity (Husserl 1970, p. 281).
Husserl calls this attitude of being straightforwardly immersed in the
world “the natural attitude,” and he thinks it is characterized by a kind
18 The Enactive Approach
of unreflective “positing” of the world as something existing “out
there” more or less independently of us.
In contrast, the “phenomenological attitude,” arises when we step
back from the natural attitude, not to deny it, but in order to investigate the very experiences it comprises. If such an investigation is to be
genuinely philosophical, then it must strive to be critical and not dogmatic, and therefore it cannot take the naïve realism of the natural attitude for granted. Yet to deny this realistic attitude would be equally
dogmatic. Rather, the realistic positing of the natural attitude must be
suspended, neutralized, or put to one side, so that it plays no role in
the investigation. In this way, we can focus on the experiences that sustain and animate the natural attitude, but in an open and nondogmatic manner. We can investigate experience in the natural attitude
without being prejudiced by an unexamined view of things, which is
characteristic of the natural attitude.
Yet how exactly is such an investigation to proceed? What exactly are
we supposed to investigate? Husserl’s answer is that our attention
should be directed toward the world strictly as we experience it. We are
to attend to the world strictly as it appears and as it is phenomenally
manifest. Put another way, we should attend to the modes or ways in
which things appear to us. We thereby attend to things strictly as correlates of our experience, and the focus of our investigation becomes
the correlational structure of our subjectivity and the appearance or
disclosure of the world.
The philosophical procedure by which this correlational structure is
investigated is known as the phenomenological reduction. “Reduction” in
this context does not mean replacing or eliminating one theory or
model in favor of another taken to be more fundamental. It signifies
rather a “leading back” (reducere) or redirection of thought away from
its unreflective and unexamined immersion in the world to the way in
which the world appears to us. To redirect our interest in this way does
not mean we doubt the things before us or that we somehow try to
turn away from the world to look elsewhere. Things remain before us,
but we envisage them in a new way, namely, strictly as experienced.
Thus, everyday things available for our perception are not doubted or
considered as illusions when they are “phenomenologically reduced,”
but instead are envisaged and examined simply and precisely as perceived. Remembered things are examined strictly and precisely as remembered, imagined things as imagined. In other words, once we adopt
The Phenomenological Connection 19
the phenomenological attitude, we are interested not in what things
are in some naïve, mind-independent or theory-independent sense,
but rather in exactly how they are experienced, and thus as strict relational correlates of our subjectivity.1
As a procedure of working back from the what to the how of experience, the phenomenological reduction has to be performed in the
first person. As is true of any such procedure, it is one thing to describe
its general theoretical character and another to describe it pragmatically, the concrete steps by which it is carried out. The main methodical step crucial for the phenomenological reduction Husserl called
the epoché. This term derives from Greek skepticism, where it means to
suspend or refrain from judgment, but Husserl adopted it as a term for
the “suspension,” “neutralization,” or “bracketing” of both our natural
“positing” attitude and our theoretical beliefs and assertions (whether
scientific or philosophical) about “objective reality.” From a more embodied and situated, first-person perspective, however, the epoché can
be described as the flexible and trainable mental skill of being able
both to suspend one’s inattentive immersion in experience and to
turn one’s attention to the manner in which something appears or is
given to experience (Depraz 1999b; Depraz, Varela, and Vermersch
2000; Steinbock 2004). Suspending one’s inattentive immersion in experience implies the capacity to notice such immersion, and thus implies what psychologists call meta-awareness (awareness of awareness).
Being able to redirect one’s attention to the manner in which something appears implies flexibility of attention; in particular it implies
being able voluntarily to shift one’s attention and stabilize or sustain it
on a given mode of presentation. The ultimate aim is not to break the
flow of experience, but to reinhabit it in a fresh way, namely, with
heightened awareness and attunement.2
Within the phenomenological tradition one can discern a certain
ambivalence regarding these theoretical and practical or existential dimensions of the epoché. On the one hand, Husserl’s great concern
was to establish phenomenology as a new philosophical foundation for
science; thus for him the epoché served largely as a critical tool of theoretical reason.3 On the other hand, because Husserl’s theoretical
project was based on a radical reappraisal of experience as the source
of meaning and knowledge, it necessitated a constant return to the patient, analytic description of lived experience through phenomenological reduction. This impulse generated a huge corpus of careful phe-
20 The Enactive Approach
nomenological analyses of human experience—the perceptual experience of space (Husserl 1997), kinesthesis and the experience of one’s
own body (Husserl 1989, 1997), time-consciousness (Husserl 1991),
affect (Husserl 2001), judgment (Husserl 1975), imagination and
memory (Husserl 2006), and intersubjectivity (Husserl 1973), to name
just a few.
Nevertheless, the epoché as a practical procedure—as a situated
practice carried out in the first person by the phenomenologist—has
remained strangely neglected in the phenomenological literature,
even by so-called existential phenomenologists such as Heidegger and
Merleau-Ponty. They instead took up and then recast in their own ways
the method of the phenomenological reduction (see Heidegger 1982,
pp.19–23; Merleau-Ponty 1962, pp. xi–xiv). For this reason, one new
current in phenomenology aims to develop more explicitly the pragmatics of the epoché as a first-person method for investigating consciousness (Depraz 1999b; Depraz, Varela, and Vermersch, 2000, 2003;
Varela and Shear 1999b). This pragmatic approach also involves comparing the epoché to first-person methods in other domains, especially
Buddhist philosophy and contemplative mental training (Depraz,
Varela, and Vermersch, 2003; Lutz, Dunne, and Davidson, 2007). In
addition, it explores the relevance of first-person methods for producing more refined first-person reports in experimental psychology
and cognitive neuroscience (Lutz and Thompson 2003). This endeavor is central to the research program known as neurophenomenology, introduced by Francisco Varela (1996) and discussed extensively later in this book.
Let us return to the phenomenological reduction in its original
philosophical context. Here the reduction, in its full sense, is a rich
mode of analysis, comprising two main steps. The first step leads back
from the natural attitude to the phenomenological attitude by neutralizing the realistic positing of the natural attitude and then orienting attention toward the disclosure or appearance of reality to us
(this step corresponds to the epoché). The second step leads from this
phenomenological attitude to a more radical kind of philosophical attitude. More precisely, this step leads from phenomenology as an empirical and psychological attitude (phenomenological psychology) to
phenomenology as a transcendental philosophical attitude (transcendental phenomenology).
The Phenomenological Connection 21
The term transcendental is used here in its Kantian sense to mean an
investigation concerned with the modes or ways in which objects are
experienced and known, and with the a priori conditions for the possibility of such experience and knowledge. Husserl casts these two aspects of transcendental inquiry in a specific form that is clearly related
to but nonetheless different from Kant’s (see Steinbock 1995, pp. 12–
15). First, transcendental phenomenology focuses not on what things
are but on the ways in which things are given. For Husserl, this means focusing on phenomena (appearances) and the senses or meanings they
have for us, and then asking how these meaningful phenomena are
constituted (brought to awareness). Second, to address this constitutional problem, transcendental phenomenology tries to uncover the
essential formal laws under which experience necessarily operates in
order to constitute a meaningful world.
In the natural attitude, reality is taken for granted as being simply
there without any active engagement on the part of consciousness. In
other words, there is no thought that reality involves acts or processes
of constitution. Grasped phenomenologically, in the transcendental
phenomenological attitude, reality is that which is disclosed to us as
real, whether in everyday perception or scientific investigation, and
such disclosure is an achievement of consciousness. The point here is
not that the world would not exist if not for consciousness. Rather, it is
that we have no grip on what reality means apart from what is disclosed
to us as real, and such disclosure necessarily involves the intentional
activity of consciousness. The point of the transcendental phenomenological reduction is to gain access to this activity and the constitutional role it plays.
It is often said that whereas Husserl’s orientation is transcendental in
this way, Heidegger and Merleau-Ponty reject the transcendental standpoint and identify the constitutional structures unearthed by phenomenology with existential structures of “being-in-the-world.” (The hyphens indicate that “being,” “in,” and “world” are not ontologically
separable, but form one irreducible and unified structure.) But this interpretation is simplistic. First, both Heidegger’s “Dasein” (his term for
individual human existence) and Merleau-Ponty’s “lived body” (a concept that comes straight from Husserl) are transcendental in the relevant sense, for they are ways of characterizing that which makes possible the disclosure or manifestation of the world as meaningful.
22 The Enactive Approach
Second, although Husserl in the most well-known portions of his work
(the writings published in his lifetime) did focus largely on the constitutional structures of “egological” consciousness (consciousness at the
level of the individual reflective “I” or “ego”), recent scholarship indicates that these analyses are not fully representative of his mature
philosophical investigations.4 As his thought developed, he greatly expanded his investigations, analyzing constitutional structures belonging to the “nonegological” (or “pre-egological”) depths of the lived
body, time-consciousness, and intersubjectivity, as well as the terrain of
historical and cultural life.5 The point here is more than an interpretive
or textual one; it is philosophical. Transcendental phenomenology
cannot be limited to—and indeed goes far beyond—a philosophy of
“egological” consciousness or subjectivity. “Transcendental” signifies a
radical attitude, one that aims to regress back to the very roots (conditions of possibility) of our experience of a meaningful world. These
roots ramify far beyond individual consciousness into the depths of our
lived bodies and out into our social and cultural worlds.
The remainder of this chapter sketches a few of these developments
of phenomenological thought. My aim is not to give a detailed scholarly account of any particular aspect of phenomenology, but to set
forth some themes and ideas important for the chapters to come.
Intentionality
A good place to begin is the phenomenological doctrine of the intentionality of consciousness. According to phenomenology, consciousness is intentional, in the sense that it “aims toward” or “intends” something beyond itself. This sense of intentional should not be confused
with the more familiar sense of having a purpose in mind when one
acts, which is only one kind of intentionality in the phenomenological
sense. Rather, intentionality is a generic term for the pointing-beyonditself proper to consciousness. (It comes from the Latin intendere,
which once referred to drawing a bow and aiming at a target.)
Phenomenologists distinguish different types of intentionality. In a
narrow sense, they define intentionality as object-directedness. In a
broader sense, they define it as openness to the world or what is
“other” (“alterity”). In either case, the emphasis is on denying that
consciousness is self-enclosed.6
The Phenomenological Connection 23
Object-directed experiences are those in which we are conscious of
something in a more-or-less determinate sense. When we see, we see
something; when we remember, we remember something; when we
hope or fear, we hope for or fear something. These kinds of “transitive
consciousness” are characterized by the intending of an object (which
need not exist). “Object” in its etymological sense means something
that stands before us. Something standing before us lies beyond, over
against, or outside of us. Object-directed experiences can thus be understood as experiences in which we are conscious of something distinct from ourselves as a present subject, whether it be a past event remembered, something perceived in the settings around us, a future
event feared or hoped for, something imagined, and so on.
Many kinds of everyday experience, however, are not object-directed
in this sense. Such experiences include bodily feelings of pain, moods
such as undirected anxiety, depression, and elation, and absorbed
skillful activity in everyday life. These experiences are not or need not
be “about” any intentional object. They are not directed toward a transcendent object, in the sense of something experienced as standing
over against oneself as a distinct subject. Put another way, they do not
have a clear subject-object structure.7
Philosophers who think of intentionality simply as object-directedness
would deny that experiences like these are intentional. Nevertheless,
such experiences do qualify as intentional in the broader phenomenological sense of being open to what is other or having a world-involving
character. Thus bodily feelings are not self-enclosed without openness to
the world. On the contrary, they present things in a certain affective
light or atmosphere and thereby deeply influence how we perceive and
respond to things. A classic example is Sartre’s discussion of feeling eyestrain and fatigue as a result of reading late into the night (1956, pp.
332–333).8 The feeling first manifests itself not as an intentional object
of transitive consciousness but as a trembling of the eyes and a blurriness
of the words on the page. One’s body and immediate environment disclose themselves in a certain manner through this feeling. In the case of
moods, although they are not object-directed in the same way intentional emotions are—such as a feeling of sympathy for a loved one or a
feeling of envy for a rival—they are nonetheless hardly self-enclosed
without reference to the world. On the contrary, as Heidegger analyzes
at length in Being and Time, moods reveal our embeddedness in the
24 The Enactive Approach
world and (as he sees it) make possible more circumscribed forms of directedness in everyday life. Finally, in absorbed skillful activities, such as
driving, dancing, or writing, one’s experience is not that of relating to a
distinct intentional object but of being engaged and immersed in a fluid
activity. Such experience takes on a subject-object structure only during
moments of breakdown or disruption (see Dreyfus 1991, 2002; Dreyfus
and Dreyfus 1986).
In phenomenology, intentional experiences are described as mental
acts—acts of perceiving, remembering, imagining, empathizing, and
so on. Phenomenology conceives of mental life as a temporally extended and dynamic process of flowing intentional acts. These acts are
animated by precognitive habits and sensibilities of the lived body. Intentional acts are performances of a person, a living bodily subject of
experience, whose cognitive and affective life is constituted by communal norms, conventions, and historical traditions. Mental life is animated by an intentional striving that aims toward and finds satisfaction
in disclosure of the intentional object. In this way, intentionality is teleological (Held 2003, p. 14).
Given this conception of intentionality, it follows that neither the
mental act nor that which it intends can be understood in isolation.
Every mental act is the very act it is in virtue of that which it intends,
and every object is constituted in and through the temporally extended course of intentional experience. As Donn Welton explains:
There is a genuinely new conception of mental acts here in play . . . On
the one hand, acts do not belong to a closed interior realm available
only to introspection. Rather, they have their being by virtue of their relationship to that which transcends them. On the other hand, the determinations of “the given” can be fully clarified only by seeing them in
relation to certain acts that contribute to their configuration. It is neither the subject nor the object but the relationship that is primary.
(Welton 2000, p. 17)
Phenomenologists call this relation the correlational structure of intentionality. “Correlational” does not mean the constant conjunction
of two terms that could be imagined to exist apart; rather, it refers to
the invariant structure of intentional act/intentional object. Objectdirected intentional experiences necessarily comprise these two inseparable poles. In Husserlian phenomenological language, these two
The Phenomenological Connection 25
poles are known as the “noema” (the object in its givenness) and the
“noesis” (the mental act that intends and discloses the object in a certain manner).9
We need to keep this framework in mind when we think about the
relation between the phenomenological conception of intentionality
and what philosophers of mind today call mental representation. In a
broad and theoretically neutral sense, a mental representation is supposed to be a mental structure (concept, thought, image) with semantic properties (content, truth conditions, reference), or a state or
process involving such a structure. Usually, a mental representation is
not considered to be an object of cognition or awareness, but rather
that by which one cognizes or is aware of something in the world.
Many phenomenologists would agree that intentional experience is
representational in this broad sense of having descriptive content—
that in intentional experience the world is represented in some particular way or other. Nevertheless, the phenomenological conception of
intentional experience has certain other distinctive features. First, in
phenomenology, as mentioned earlier, intentional experiences are
conceptualized not as states having content but as acts having directedness.
These two conceptions are not necessarily incompatible, but their theoretical orientation and emphasis are different. Second, “re-presentation,” in its technical phenomenological sense, applies only to certain
types of intentional acts, namely, those that mentally evoke or bring to
presence something that is not present in its bodily being.
Phenomenologists thus draw a crucial distinction between intentional acts of presentation (Gegenwärtigung) and of re-presentation (Vergegenwärtigung) (see Marbach 1993). On the one hand, perceptual experience is presentational: in this type of experience the object is
given as present in its very being. In memory or imagination, on the
other hand, the object imagined or remembered is not given as
present in its very being, but rather as both phenomenally absent and
as mentally evoked or called forth. In this way, memory and imagination are said to be re-presentational. Note that the definitive feature
of re-presentational experience is that the object is given as absent
and as mentally evoked, but not necessarily as re-evoked or called
forth again. Re-evoking belongs to memory but not necessarily to visualizing or fantasizing. Note also that re-presentational experiences
do not float freely, as it were, but arise in relation to ongoing presen-
26 The Enactive Approach
tational experiences of one’s surroundings. I discuss this phenomenological conception of mental re-presentation in connection with
mental imagery in Chapter 10.
Let us return to the connection between phenomenology and the
enactive approach. As we will see in Chapter 3, the main explanatory
tool of the enactive approach is the theory of self-organizing and autonomous dynamic systems. Such systems bring forth or enact
meaning in continuous reciprocal interaction with their environments. “Inner” and “outer” are not preexisting separate spheres, but
mutually specifying domains enacted or brought forth by the structural coupling of the system and its environment. This subpersonal account of cognitive systems echoes the personal-level account of the
correlational structure of intentionality.10 As Jean-Pierre Dupuy writes
in his philosophical history of cognitive science, discussing the “missed
encounter” between phenomenology and mind science in the cybernetic era:
A given [autonomous] network usually possesses a multiplicity of selfbehaviors (or, as they are sometimes called, “attractors” . . . ) and converges toward one or another of them depending on the initial conditions of the network. The “life” of a network can thus be conceived as a
trajectory through a “landscape” of attractors, passing from one to another as a result of perturbations or shocks from the external world.
Note that these external events come to acquire meaning in the context
of the network as a result of the network’s own activity: the content—the
meaning—that the network attributes to them is precisely the selfbehavior, or attractor that results from them. Obviously, then, this content is purely endogenous and not the reflection of some external
“transcendent” objectivity.
It should be obvious, too, that this line of argument . . . provides us
with at least the germ of a very satisfactory model of what Brentano
called “immanent objectivity” . . . The attractor is an entity that both
fully participates in the activity of the network and yet in some sense, by
virtue of the fact that it results from a higher level of logical complexity,
transcends the activity of the network. The dynamics of the network
may therefore be said to tend toward an attractor, although the latter is
only a product of these dynamics. The network is thus an intentional
creature in Brentano and Husserl’s sense. Systems theory was to coin
The Phenomenological Connection 27
another term to describe this paradoxical relationship between the dynamics of a system and its attractor, referring to it as “autotranscendence.” This is not very different, really, from Husserl’s notion of “transcendence within immanence.” (Dupuy 2000, pp. 104–105)
Because this notion of transcendence-within-immanence is often
misunderstood, it bears clarification here. It does not mean that what
appears to be beyond or outside the sphere of mental activity is really
contained within the mind (in some idealist or internalist sense).
Rather, the crucial point is that the transcendent is given as such by
virtue of the intentional activities of consciousness. Thus it falls
within the sphere of what is phenomenologically constituted (disclosed or brought to awareness by consciousness). Clearly, this point
makes sense only at a transcendental level, for at this level the transcendent is understood as a mode of givenness or disclosure (one characterizing things in the world, but not one’s own consciousness).
Thus, at a transcendental level, what is really or genuinely transcendent
is also phenomenologically immanent (see Crowell, in press, for further
discussion).
The correspondence between phenomenology and dynamic systems
theory to which Dupuy is pointing should therefore be understood as
follows. External events are really transcendent, for they are certainly not
contained within the system, nor are they a mere product of what goes
inside the system. Nevertheless, they are intentionally immanent, in the
following sense: they do not arrive already labeled, as it were, as external events; instead they are constituted or disclosed as such, and
with the significance they have, by virtue of the network’s autonomous
(self-organizing) dynamics. In other words, their status as external
events for the system (as opposed to their status for an observer of the
system) is a function of the system’s own activity. Their meaning or significance corresponds to an attractor of the system’s dynamics (a recurrent pattern of activity toward which the system tends), which itself
is an emergent product of that very dynamics. The external world is
constituted as such for the system by virtue of the system’s selforganizing activity. Dupuy’s proposal, in a nutshell, is that constitutional
intentionality corresponds to a kind of self-organization. This proposal, as we
will see in later chapters, is one of the key guiding intuitions of the enactive approach and neurophenomenology.
28 The Enactive Approach
From Static to Genetic Phenomenology
This convergence between phenomenology and the enactive approach can be taken further. The correlational structure of intentionality belongs to what Husserl called static phenomenology. As his
thought progressed, however, Husserl found that he needed to articulate a genetic phenomenology, that is, a phenomenology whose point of
departure is not the explicit correlational structure of intentional act
(noesis) and intentional object (noema), but rather the genesis of intentional experience in time. From the standpoint of genetic phenomenology, we need to account for the correlational structure of intentionality developmentally by understanding how it emerges from
inarticulate experience that does not have a clear subject-object structure. One wellspring of this kind of experience is the lived body (Leib);
another is time-consciousness. The shift from static to genetic phenomenology thus marks a turn toward the lived body and timeconsciousness. Thus it enables us to deepen the connection between
phenomenology and the enactive approach.
Static phenomenology makes use of two methodological strategies
(Steinbock 1995, pp. 38–39). The first is static analysis or the analysis
of invariant formal structures of experience, such as the correlational
structure of intentionality, or the difference between presentational
and re-presentational mental acts and the ways the latter presuppose
the former. The second strategy is constitutional analysis—the analysis
of how things are disclosed or brought to awareness by virtue of the intentional activities of consciousness. From a transcendental perspective, the invariant formal structures of experience uncovered by static
analysis are precisely the essential formal laws under which experience
necessarily operates in order to constitute its objects. An example is
Husserl’s investigation in his 1907 lectures, “Thing and Space,” of the
conditions of possibility for the perceptual experience of things in
space (Husserl 1997). Husserl shows that visual perception depends
constitutively on certain invariant functional interdependencies between visual sensation and the experience of moving one’s body
(which he calls kinesthesis). These analyses anticipate recent enactive
or dynamic sensorimotor accounts of perception (discussed in
Chapter 9). According to these accounts, to perceive is to exercise
one’s skillful mastery of the ways sensory stimulation varies as a result
of bodily movement (Noë 2004; O’Regan and Noë 2001a).
The Phenomenological Connection 29
Unlike static phenomenology, genetic phenomenology does not
take the already disclosed intentional object as its point of departure,
nor is it content to stay at the level of analyzing formal and constitutive
structures of experience. Instead, it investigates the genesis and development of those structures themselves. After all, we do not simply
drop into the world and open our eyes and see. What we see is a function of how we see, and how we see is a function of previous experience. For genetic phenomenology, what we experience is not a fixed
given but something that has come to be given—something emergent—
out of previous experience (Bernet, Kern, and Marbach 1993, pp.
200–201). In Chapters 11 and 12, I discuss phenomenological analyses
of time-consciousness and affect produced from this genetic orientation and relate them to research in psychology and neuroscience.
Genetic phenomenology also brings with it a different way of
thinking about the conscious subject. From a static viewpoint, the “I” is
thought of as a kind of “ego-pole” of the noetic-noematic structure, in
contraposition to the “object-pole.”11 A fuller articulation of the correlational structure of intentionality would thus be [ego] noesis-noema
(I intend the intentional object). From a genetic standpoint, however,
this way of thinking remains abstract because it ignores the temporal
development and individuation of the subject. The “I” or “ego” is not a
mere “empty pole” of selfhood in experience but a concrete subject
having habits, interests, convictions, and capabilities as a result of accumulated experience. In other words, the subject has to be seen as
having a “life” in all the rich senses of this word—as formed by its individual history, as a living bodily subject of experience (Leib), and as belonging to an intersubjective “life-world” (Lebenswelt).
Genetic phenomenology distinguishes between active genesis and
passive genesis. In active genesis subjects play an active and deliberate,
productive role in the constitution of objects. The products of active
genesis are tools, artworks, scientific theories, experimental interventions, logical judgments, mathematical propositions, and so on. Active
genesis, however, always presupposes a passivity by which one is affected
beforehand. It must be stressed that “passive” in this context does not
mean a state of inactivity, but rather a state of being involuntarily influenced and affected by something. In particular, it means being influenced and affected on an aesthetic level, in the original Greek sense of
aisthesis as sense perception, including especially the perception and
felt experience of what is attractive and unattractive. Thus the thought
30 The Enactive Approach
behind the active / passive distinction is that our active orientation
toward things in practical or theoretical reason, or artistic creation, presupposes a deeper and more fundamental openness to the world. It is
an openness to being sensuously affected and solicited by the world
through the medium of our living body, and responding by attraction
and repulsion. Investigating these sensorimotor and affective depths of
experience leads phenomenology to the notion of passive genesis. In
passive genesis, the lived body constitutes itself and its surrounding environment through the involuntary formation of habits, motor patterns, associations, dispositions, motivations, emotions, and memories.
At this level of “passive synthesis” in experience, the relevant notion
of intentionality is not so much object-directedness as openness to the
world, here in the bodily form of an implicit sensibility or sentience
that does not have any clear subject-object structure. Intentionality at
this level functions anonymously, involuntarily, spontaneously, and receptively. Husserl distinguishes between receptivity and affectivity
(2001, pp. 105, 127). As Dan Zahavi explains, “Receptivity is taken to
be the first, lowest, and most primitive type of intentional activity, and
consists in responding to or paying attention to that which is affecting
us passively. Thus, even receptivity understood as a mere ‘I notice’ presupposes a prior affection” (Zahavi 1999, p. 116; see also the Translator’s Introduction to Husserl 2001). Affection here means being affectively influenced or perturbed. The idea is that whatever comes into
relief in experience must have already been affecting us and must have
some kind of “affective force” or “affective allure” in relation to our attention and motivations. Whatever exercises affective allure without
our turning to it attentively is said to be “pregiven,” and whatever succeeds in gaining attention is said to be “given.” Thus the given—the
mode or way in which something appears to object-directed consciousness—has to be understood dynamically and teleologically as emergent in relation to the pregiven. Object-directed intentional experiences emerge out of the background of a precognitive “operative
intentionality” (Merleau-Ponty 1962, p. xviii) that involves a dynamic
interplay of affective sensibility, motivation, and attention. This affectively “saturated intentionality” (Steinbock 1999) provides our primordial openness to the world.
The phenomenological terrain of “passive synthesis” is rich in potential for illuminating and being illuminated by research in psychology and neuroscience on emotion and cognition. Some of these
The Phenomenological Connection 31
connections are already discernible in Husserl’s description of passive
synthesis as operating according to a principle of association (Husserl
1960, pp. 80–81; 2001, pp. 162–242). For Husserl, association is an intentional process whereby experiences are built up or synthesized into
larger, patterned wholes. Using the terminology of emergence, we
could say that association is the process by which coherent patterns of
experience emerge from conjoined and reciprocally affecting experiences. Here are a few vivid examples given by William James in his
Principles of Psychology:
Let a person enter his room in the dark and grope among the objects
there. The touch of the matches will instantaneously recall their appearance. If his hand comes in contact with an orange on the table, the
golden yellow of the fruit, its savor and perfume will forthwith shoot
through his mind. In passing the hand over the sideboard or in jogging
the coal-scuttle with the foot, the large glossy dark shape of the one and
the irregular blackness of the other awaken in a flash and constitute
what we call the recognition of objects. The voice of the violin faintly
echoes through the mind as the hand is laid upon it in the dark, and
the feeling of the garments or draperies which may hang about the
room is not understood till the look correlative to the feeling has in
each case been resuscitated . . . But the most notorious and important
case of the mental combination of auditory with optical impressions
originally experienced together is furnished by language. The child is
offered a new and delicious fruit and is at the same time told that it is
called a “fig.” Or looking out of the window he exclaims, “What a funny
horse!” and is told that it is a “piebald” horse. When learning his letters,
the sound of each is repeated to him whilst its shape is before his eye.
Thenceforward, long as he may live, he will never see a fig, a piebald
horse, or a letter of the alphabet without the name which he first heard
in conjunction with each clinging to it in his mind; and inversely he will
never hear the name without the faint arousal of the image of the object. (1981, pp. 524–525)
According to the empiricist philosophers Locke and Hume, such associations happen in a completely mechanical way. Association operates as a kind of connective force in the mind that links impressions
and ideas simply in virtue of their simultaneous occurrence, proximity,
or repeated succession. Hume’s analysis of causation provides a famous example of this way of thinking about association. Hume argued
32 The Enactive Approach
that causal connections are neither directly observable nor provable by
reason, but are objects of mere belief based on habit and custom. The
belief in a causal connection between A and B arises from the association or “constant conjunction” of A and B in past experience: experiences of A constantly conjoined to experiences of B make the mind habitually expect that the occurrence of A will be followed by the
occurrence of B.
For Husserl (and James), however, association is not meaningless
and mechanical, but thoroughly intentional. Association is not the mechanical aggregation of complex experiences out of preexisting
experience-atoms. Husserl, like James, completely rejects this atomistic
conception of experience. Like emergent processes in a self-organizing
system, associated experiences reciprocally strengthen and reinforce
each other and thereby give rise to new formations that supersede their
prior separateness. Association also involves the retention and anticipation of sense or meaning. Earlier experiences are affectively “awakened” by later ones on the basis of their felt similarities, and they motivate the anticipation that what is to come will cohere with the sense or
meaning of experience so far. In Husserl’s terminology, there is an
“analogical transfer of sense” from earlier to later experience: what is
present now is passively apprehended within a sense that has its roots in
earlier experience and that has since become habitual (Bernet, Kern,
and Marbach 1993, p. 202).
The notion of habit is central to Husserl’s conception of passive genesis, as he states explicitly in a lecture from 1927: “As Hume correctly
teaches, habit is not only our nurse, rather it is the function of consciousness that shapes and constantly further shapes the world”
(quoted by Bernet, Kern, and Marbach 1993, p. 203; see also Welton
2000, p. 243). Husserl mentions Hume, but the notion of habit was very
important to James as well. In his Principles of Psychology James declared
that habit is the ground of all association in the stream of consciousness
and in brain activity (thereby anticipating Donald Hebb and connectionism).12 Later, in 1945, Merleau-Ponty introduced his notion of the
habit-body in his Phenomenology of Perception while discussing the experience of the phantom limb: “our body comprises as it were two distinct
layers, that of the habit-body and that of the body at this moment. In
the first appear manipulatory movements which have disappeared from
the second, and the problem how I can have the sensation of still pos-
The Phenomenological Connection 33
sessing a limb which I no longer have amounts to finding out how the
habitual body can act as guarantee for the body at this moment” (1962,
p. 82). To say that the habitual body acts as guarantee for the body at
this moment is to say that one’s lived body is a developmental being
thick with its own history and sedimented ways of feeling, perceiving,
acting, and imagining. These sedimented patterns are not limited to
the space enclosed by the body’s membrane; they span and interweave
the lived body and its environment, thereby forming a unitary circuit of
lived-body-environment (Gallagher 1986b).
In Part III, I will explore this convergence of genetic phenomenology and enactive cognitive science in greater detail. For now let me
simply point out how important the dynamic coupling between one’s
lived body and the surrounding world is to both perspectives. In this
coupling, the motivating undercurrent is the habitual and associative
linkage of affective, sensorimotor, and imaginative bodily experiences.
From Genetic to Generative Phenomenology
Late in his life Husserl began to move in still another direction—from
genetic phenomenology to generative phenomenology. Already in genetic
phenomenology intersubjectivity had arisen as an important theme, in
the form of the dynamic coupling between self and other on the basis
of their lived bodily presence to one another. Generative phenomenology, however, widened the scope of this genetic analysis beyond the
self-other relation to include the parameters of birth and death as well
as the interconnectedness of generations.
In this context, the term generative has a double meaning: it means
both the process of becoming and the process of occurring over the
generations (Steinbock 1995, p. 3). Generative phenomenology concerns the historical, social, and cultural becoming of human experience. If static phenomenology is restricted in scope with respect to genetic phenomenology, then genetic phenomenology is restricted in
scope with respect to generative phenomenology: the subject matter of
generative phenomenology is the historical and intersubjective becoming of human experience, whereas genetic phenomenology focuses on individual development without explicit analysis of its generational and historical embeddedness.
In shifting from a genetic to a generative register, the notion of the
34 The Enactive Approach
lived body is complemented with that of the life-world (Husserl 1970;
Steinbock 1995, pp. 86–122; Welton 2000, pp. 331–346). The life-world
is the everyday world in which we live. It is “always already pregiven,”
serving as the horizon of all our activities, practical and theoretical.
Two important aspects of this rich and multifaceted notion need to be
mentioned here—the back-and-forth circulation or exchange within
the life-world between empirical science and everyday human life, and
the life-world as the pregiven horizon and ground of all human activity.
The life-world comprises the everyday world and the things that can
be directly experienced within the everyday world—our living bodies,
our natural surroundings, and our cultural creations (tools, artworks,
and so on). The life-world is subject-relative in the sense that it is relationally bound to human subjectivity. This is in contrast to “objective
nature” as conceived by science, which is arrived at through logical
and theoretical abstraction. Nature so construed is an objectification
and has as its cognitive correlate the objectifying intentional attitude
adopted by a community of theorizing subjects. Objective nature presupposes the life-world as its evidential source and ground. In principle it
cannot be experienced directly because it is the product of abstraction
and idealization. Nevertheless, the propositions, models, logical constructs, and experimental techniques of the sciences are clearly experienceable in another sense: they are human accomplishments that have
experiential validity for members of the scientific community, and
their effects flow into the everyday world and become tangibly experienced in the form of technology and social practice. Our life-world encompasses science, in addition to other spheres of experience such as
art, philosophy, and religion. Hence, there is a necessary “circulation”
between everyday experience and scientific experience (Varela,
Thompson, and Rosch 1991, pp. 10–14). On the one hand, everyday
experience provides the sensuous, material contents from which and
with which science must work. On the other hand, the scientific
analyses built from these contents contribute to the formation of our
life-world and provide important leading clues for phenomenological
analyses of how our experience of the world is genetically and generatively constituted.
In taking up these phenomenological analyses, Husserl initially conceived of the life-world as a synthetic totality. Hence he treated it on
The Phenomenological Connection 35
the model of an object, albeit a peculiar all-encompassing one (see
Steinbock 1995, pp. 98–102; Welton 2000, pp. 336–346). Eventually,
however, it became clear to him that the life-world cannot be given as
any kind of intentional object, for it is always already there, pregiven
rather than given.13 Thus, in a crucial and famous passage from his last
work, The Crisis of European Sciences and Transcendental Phenomenology
(1970, §37, pp. 142–143), he wrote that the world is always already
there, existing in advance for us, as the “ground” and “horizon” of any
human activity. He then asserted that the way we are conscious of the
world and the way we are conscious of things or objects, though inseparably united, are fundamentally different. We can be conscious of
things only as things within the world horizon, and we can be conscious of the world horizon only as a horizon for existing objects. Yet
the world is not any kind of entity, nor is it simply the totality of entities, precisely because it is the horizon presupposed by any entity or
any totality. It is tempting to say “the world is one,” except that, as
Husserl puts it, the world “exists with such uniqueness that the plural
makes no sense when applied to it.” In other words, the world is not
one in any sense in which it could have been two. To put it another
way, to describe the world as “unique,” such that “every singular and
every plural drawn from it, presupposes the world horizon,” means
that the notion of counting makes no sense or has no application
here.14 Given this difference between the manner in which any object
is given and the manner in which the world horizon is given (namely,
as always already pregiven), it follows that there must be “fundamentally different correlative types of consciousness for them.”
Husserl’s terms horizon and ground are metaphorical, at once visual
and geological. A horizon is not a thing “out there” but rather a structure of appearance. It therefore implicates or points back to the perceiver for whom appearances are so structured. In phenomenological
language, “horizon” taken noematically as a structure of appearance
necessarily implicates “horizon” taken noetically as a structure of consciousness. One could say that a horizon is the precondition for the appearance of anything, except that “precondition” is too static. Stated
in a genetic register, a horizon is a dynamic structure of disclosure in
which both the object (noema) and consciousness (noesis) partake
(Steinbock 1995, p. 107). Anything that comes forth, manifests, or
emerges does so in an open clearing or expanse, delimited by a
36 The Enactive Approach
horizon. The horizon of every possible horizon is the world. Yet the
world-horizon cannot be the synthesis, totality, or mereological sum of
all these possible horizons because it is pregiven or a priori with respect
to any of them and thus is sui generis. Similarly, to describe the lifeworld as ground (Boden) is not to say that it is a static foundation;
rather, it is the pregiven soil out of which everything is generated and
nourished. This soil includes one’s forebears and culture. We human
beings constitute and reconstitute ourselves through cultural traditions, which we experience as our own development in a historical
time that spans the generations. To investigate the life-world as
horizon and ground of all experience therefore requires investigating
none other than generativity—the processes of becoming, of making
and remaking, that occur over the generations and within which any
individual genesis is always already situated.
Generative phenomenology brings to the fore the intersubjective,
social, and cultural aspects of our radical embodiment. Individuals are
born and die, they develop and constantly change, and they emerge
from their forebears and perpetuate themselves in generations to
come. Individual subjectivity is from the outset intersubjectivity, originally engaged with and altered by others in specific geological and cultural environments (Depraz 1999c, p. 482; Steinbock 1995). Individual
subjectivity is intersubjectively and culturally embodied, embedded,
and emergent.
Classical cognitive science, to the extent that it operated under the
assumption that the individual self comes first and the other second,
simply left out intersubjectivity and culture. Indeed, it had no real
means to analyze their contributions to the “cognitive architecture” of
the human mind. As a result, classical cognitive science has offered abstract and reified models of the mind as a disembodied and cultureless
physical symbol system or connectionist neural network in the head of
a solitary individual. As we will see in the last chapter of this book,
however, the enactive approach, particularly when guided by genetic
and generative phenomenologies of the lived body, intersubjectivity,
and the life-world, offers a different vision. I will argue that self and
other enact each other reciprocally through empathy and that human
subjectivity emerges from developmental processes of enculturation
and is configured by the distributed cognitive web of symbolic culture.
THREE
◆ ◆ ◆
Autonomy and Emergence
ACCORDING TO THE ENACTIVE APPROACH, the human mind emerges
from self-organizing processes that tightly interconnect the brain, body,
and environment at multiple levels. The key ideas on which this proposition is based are those of autonomous systems and emergence or emergent
processes. In this chapter, I explain these ideas. In the next chapter, I explore some connections between these ideas and phenomenological
ideas about form, in particular forms or structures of behavior. These
two chapters will lay the groundwork for the enactive strategy of addressing the explanatory gap by going back to the roots of mind in life
and then working forward to subjectivity and consciousness.
In the first section of this chapter, I review some basic ideas about dynamic systems that form a background for the enactive approach. In
the second section, I explain the notion of an autonomous system. A
distinctive feature of the enactive approach is the emphasis it gives to
autonomy. In brief, an autonomous system is a self-determining
system, as distinguished from a system determined from the outside,
or a heteronomous system. On the one hand, a living cell, a multicellular animal, an ant colony, or a human being behaves as a coherent,
self-determining unity in its interactions with its environment. An automatic bank machine, on the other hand, is determined and controlled from the outside, in the realm of human design. The paradigm
for interaction with a heteronomous system is input/processing/
output, in which deviations from desired outputs are seen as system errors. The paradigm for interaction with an autonomous system is a
37
38 The Enactive Approach
conversation, in which unsatisfactory outcomes are seen as breaches of
understanding (Varela 1979, p. xii). According to the enactive approach, living beings and cognitive agents need to be understood as
autonomous systems. I discuss the implications of this autonomy perspective for how we think about information in the third section.
In the fourth section, I turn to emergence, a now familiar notion that
describes the arising of large-scale, collective patterns of behavior in complex systems as diverse as cells, brains, ecosystems, cities, and economies.
Emergence is closely related to self-organization and circular causality,
both of which involve the reciprocal influence of “bottom-up” and “topdown” processes. For example, a tornado emerges through the selforganization of circulating air and water particles; it reciprocally sucks
those particles into a particular macroscopic configuration, with devastating effect for anything in its path. In this section, I sketch a way of
thinking about emergence that I call dynamic co-emergence. Dynamic
co-emergence means that a whole not only arises from its parts, but the
parts also arise from the whole. Part and whole co-emerge and mutually
specify each other. A whole cannot be reduced to its parts, for the parts
cannot be characterized independently of the whole; conversely, the
parts cannot be reduced to the whole, for the whole cannot be characterized independently of the parts. I discuss philosophical issues related
to this conception of emergence in Appendix B.
Dynamic Systems
In recent years growing interest in the dynamics of cognition and emotion has given rise to a distinct dynamical approach in mind science
(Kelso 1995; Lewis and Granic 2000; Port and van Gelder 1995; Thelen
and Smith 1994). The central idea of the dynamical approach is that
natural cognition—cognition in evolved, living agents—is a dynamic
phenomenon and accordingly needs to be understood from the perspective of the science of dynamic systems. This perspective includes
dynamic-systems theory (a branch of pure mathematics), dynamicsystems modeling (mathematical modeling of empirical systems), and
experimental investigations of biological and psychological phenomena
informed by these tools.
The first important concept we need to introduce in this context is
that of a dynamic system.1 In simple terms a dynamic system is one that
Autonomy and Emergence 39
changes over time. The term system, however, is ambiguous, in that it
can refer either to an actual system in the world, such as the solar
system, or to a mathematical model of an actual system. In the case of
the actual world, the term system does not admit of precise definition.
In general, a system is a collection of related entities or processes that
stands out from a background as a single whole, as some observer sees
and conceptualizes things. The classic example from the history of science is the solar system. Its components are the sun, moon, and
planets, and its states are their possible configurations. What changes
over time is the state of the system. A dynamic system in the sense of a
model, however, is a mathematical construction that aims to describe
and predict the way an actual system changes over time (the paths of
the planets, and events such as eclipses, in the case of the solar
system). To this end, some aspects of the actual system are singled out
as being especially important and are mathematically represented by
quantitative variables. Specifying the numerical values of all the variables at a given time indicates the state of the system at that time. A dynamic system includes a procedure for producing such a description
of the state of the system and a rule for transforming the current statedescription into another state-description for some future time. A dynamic system is thus a mathematical model for the way that a system
changes or behaves as time passes.
If the passage of time is considered to be continuous (like the
sweeping second hand of an analogue clock), then the dynamic system
is a differentiable one: the variables change in a smooth and continuous way, and the rules or “evolution equations” that govern the
changing state of the system take the form of differential equations. If
time is considered to pass in evenly spaced, discrete jumps (like a digital clock), then the system is described by a difference equation or a
mapping (a function repeatedly applied or iterated in discrete time
steps). Some differential equations have an analytical solution, which
means they can be exactly solved by mathematical formulas. Given the
starting values of the variables (the initial conditions), then all future
states of the system can be known without recalculating the state of the
system for each time increment. Most differential equations, however,
cannot be solved in this way. When the equations contain nonlinear
terms—functions in which the value of the output is not directly proportional to the sum of the inputs—then such a solution is impossible.
40 The Enactive Approach
Therefore a different mathematical approach has to be taken from
that of finding a formula that makes possible the prediction of a future
state from a present one.
This other approach, introduced by Henri Poincaré in the nineteenth century, is known as the qualitative study of differential equations (or of nonlinear differentiable dynamic systems). One thinks of
the space of all possible states of the system as a geometric space,
known as state space or phase space, and the way that the system
changes or behaves over time as curves or trajectories in this space. Instead of seeking a formula for each solution as a function of time, one
studies the collection of all solutions (corresponding to trajectories in
phase space) for all times and initial conditions at once (Norton 1995,
p. 46). This approach is said to be qualitative because it uses topological and geometrical techniques to study the general or global character of the system’s long-term behavior (its behavior in phase space),
instead of seeking to predict the system’s exact future state (the specific values of its variables at a future time). It is precisely this qualitative approach to dynamics that goes by the name of dynamic systems
theory.
We need to introduce one more related notion—that of complexity.
The term complexity describes behavior that is neither random nor ordered and predictable; rather, it is in between, exhibiting changing
and unstable patterns. Of particular importance in the context of recent nonlinear dynamic-systems approaches to the brain and behavior
is the notion of complexity as dynamic instability or metastability—“the successive expression of different transient dynamics with stereotyped
temporal patterns being continuously created and destroyed and reemerging again” (Friston 2000b, p. 238). Recent science indicates that
complexity of this sort can be found at numerous scales and levels,
from the molecular and organismic to the ecological and evolutionary,
as well as the neural and behavioral.2 In every case the message seems
to be that complexity, instability, or metastability is necessary for selforganization and adaptive behavior.
We can now return to the dynamical approach in mind science. The
fundamental dynamical hypothesis of this approach is that natural
cognitive agents (people and other animals) are dynamic systems (or,
more precisely, that the cognitive systems agents instantiate are dynamic systems), and that accordingly action, perception, and cogni-
Autonomy and Emergence 41
tion should be explained in dynamic terms (van Gelder 1998). Proponents of the dynamical hypothesis contrast it with the cognitivist hypothesis, which states that cognitive agents (or the cognitive systems
they instantiate), whether natural or artificial, are digital computers or
physical symbol systems and that accordingly cognition should be explained in symbol-processing terms.
To illustrate these ideas, we can turn to research on neural and behavioral coordination dynamics by Haken, Kelso, and colleagues
(Bressler and Kelso 2001; Kelso 1995). One case they have studied is
rhythmic finger movement (Haken, Kelso, and Bunz 1985). The experimental task was to move the two index fingers at the same frequency from side to side. At low speeds, there are two comfortable coordination patterns (the system is bistable): either the fingers move
in-phase (equivalent muscle groups in each hand contract simultaneously) or anti-phase (equivalent muscle groups alternate in their contraction and expansion). As the speed gradually increases, the inphase pattern becomes unstable, and eventually at a certain critical
frequency the fingers spontaneously switch to an anti-phase pattern
(the system undergoes a bifurcation). As the speed decreases, the inphase pattern becomes stable again, but it does so below the original
switching point (this delayed return to a previous state is known as hysteresis).
Haken, Kelso, and colleagues devised a dynamic-systems model to
describe and predict these properties of motor behavior. The model
describes how the relative phase relation between the two fingers
evolves over time. Relative phase is an example of a “collective variable”—one whose value is set by the relation between the values of
other variables, in this case those describing the individual finger
movements. A collective variable describes a high-level or global characteristic of a system that emerges as a coherent and ordered pattern
from the interactions of the system’s components. This macrolevel pattern is also known as an order parameter because it reduces the degrees of freedom of the system’s components by organizing them into
a coherent and ordered pattern. When the fingers move in-phase, the
collective variable or order parameter of relative phase is zero; once
the critical transition or bifurcation to anti-phase happens, the relative
phase becomes nonzero up to some maximum value. Because the
phase transition occurs at a certain critical frequency of finger oscilla-
42 The Enactive Approach
tion, the frequency acts as a “control parameter” for the system. The
control parameter does not dictate or prescribe the collective variable
or order parameter (the emergent pattern of relative phase). Rather,
its changing values lead the system through a variety of possible patterns or states (Kelso 1995, p. 7). Thus the model mathematically describes how the control parameter of finger-movement frequency
leads the system through different patterns of finger coordination.
In the language of dynamic-systems theory, this kind of description
gives the state space of the system—the abstract and multidimensional
space that represents all possible states of the system by specifying all
possible values of the system’s variables. The temporal evolution of the
system corresponds to its trajectory through this space. The model predicts the observed switching from one phase to another without
positing any internal motor program that directs the switches by issuing symbolic instructions. Instead, the phase transitions occur spontaneously as emergent properties of the system’s self-organizing dynamics. Kelso and colleagues have extended and developed this type
of phase-transition model to apply to a wide variety of cognitive domains, such as motor skill learning, speech perception, visual perception, and the dynamic coordination of activity among cortical areas of
the brain (Bressler and Kelso 2001; Kelso 1995).
One of the key points relating to the dynamical approach is its emphasis on time. Traditional computational models are static in that
they specify only a sequence of discrete states through which the
system must pass. In contrast, dynamic-systems models specify how processes unfold in real time. As Tim van Gelder states, “Although all cognitive scientists understand cognition as something that happens over
time, dynamicists see cognition as being in time, that is, as an essentially temporal phenomenon (van Gelder 1999a, p. 244). Van Gelder
(1998) describes this contrast as one between change versus state; geometry versus structure; structure in time versus static structure; time versus
order; parallel versus serial; and ongoing versus input/output.
Whereas computationalists focus primarily on discrete states and
treat change as what happens when a system shifts from one discrete
state to another, dynamicists focus on how a system changes state continuously in time. Dynamicists conceive of state changes geometrically,
in terms of their position and trajectory in phase space, whereas computationalists focus on the internal formal or syntactic structure of
Autonomy and Emergence 43
combinatorial entities. Computationalists think of these structures as
laid out statically (like snapshots), as either present all at once or not,
and hence of cognition as the rule-governed transformation of one
such static structure into another. For dynamicists, cognitive structures
are laid out as temporally extended patterns of activity, and cognition
is seen as the flow of complex temporal structures mutually and simultaneously influencing each other. Dynamicists are therefore interested
in the timing (rates, periods, durations, synchronies) of processes,
whereas computationalists have traditionally been interested only in
the order of cognitive states. Moreover, computationalists tend to
think of this order as being the serial or sequential progression of
sense → perceive → think → act, whereas for dynamicists cognition
unfolds as the continuous coevolution of acting, perceiving, imagining, feeling, and thinking. Finally, whereas computationalists think
of cognitive processes as having an input-output structure—the system
receives an input, proceeds through a sequence of internal operations,
produces an output, and then halts—dynamicists think of processes as
always ongoing, with no clear starting or end points. The goal is not to
map an input at one time onto an output at a later time, but always to
maintain appropriate change (van Gelder 1998).
Autonomous Systems
The dynamicist idea that cognitive processes are always ongoing with
no clear starting or end points can be deepened by introducing the
distinction between autonomous and heteronomous systems. Autonomy and heteronomy literally mean, respectively, self-governed and
other-governed. A heteronomous system is one whose organization is
defined by input-output information flow and external mechanisms of
control. Traditional computational systems, cognitivist or connectionist, are heteronomous. For instance, a typical connectionist network has an input layer and an output layer; the inputs are initially assigned by the observer outside the system; and output performance is
evaluated in relation to an externally imposed task. An autonomous
system, however, is defined by its endogenous, self-organizing and selfcontrolling dynamics, does not have inputs and outputs in the usual
sense, and determines the cognitive domain in which it operates
(Varela 1979; Varela and Bourgine 1991).
44 The Enactive Approach
In general, to specify any system one needs to describe its organization—the set of relations that defines it as the system it is. In complex
systems theory, the term autonomous refers to a generic type of organization. The relations that define the autonomous organization hold
between processes (such as metabolic reactions in a cell or neuronal
firings in a cell assembly) rather than static entities. In an autonomous
system, the constituent processes (i) recursively depend on each other
for their generation and their realization as a network, (ii) constitute
the system as a unity in whatever domain they exist, and (iii) determine a domain of possible interactions with the environment (Varela
1979, p. 55). The paradigm is a living cell. The constituent processes in
this case are chemical; their recursive interdependence takes the form
of a self-producing, metabolic network that also produces its own
membrane; and this network constitutes the system as a unity in the
biochemical domain and determines a domain of possible interactions
with the environment. This kind of autonomy in the biochemical domain is known as autopoiesis (Maturana and Varela 1980). Figure 3.1 illustrates the basic organization required for autopoietic autonomy.
Autopoiesis is the paradigm case of biological autonomy for two reasons. It is empirically the best understood case, and it provides the
core “biologic” of all life on Earth. To qualify as autonomous, however,
a system does not have to be autopoietic in the strict sense (a selfproducing bounded molecular system). An autopoietic system dynamically produces its own material boundary or membrane, but a system
can be autonomous without having this sort of material boundary. The
members of an insect colony, for example, form an autonomous social
network, but the boundary is social and territorial, not material.
In exploring the notion of autonomy, we can take two complementary approaches—a top-down approach and a bottom-up one (RuizMirazo and Moreno 2004). Both approaches see autonomy as a relational, system-level property, but there is a critical difference between
the two. Whereas the top-down approach focuses on the relational organization proper to autonomy, the bottom-up approach emphasizes
the energetic and thermodynamic requirements for autonomy.
Varela takes the top-down approach in his 1979 book, Principles of Biological Autonomy.3 In this work he defines an autonomous system as a
system that has organizational closure (later called operational closure)
(Varela 1979, pp. 55–60). Here closure does not mean that the system is
Autonomy and Emergence 45
Figure 3.1. The basic autopoietic organization.
materially and energetically closed to the outside world (which of course
is impossible). On the contrary, autonomous systems must be thermodynamically far-from-equilibrium systems, which incessantly exchange
matter and energy with their surroundings. Organizational closure refers
to the self-referential (circular and recursive) network of relations that
defines the system as a unity, and operational closure to the reentrant and
recurrent dynamics of such a system.4 An autonomous system is always
structurally coupled to its environment. Two or more systems are
coupled when the conduct of each is a function of the conduct of the
other. (In dynamic-systems language, the state variables of one system
are parameters of the other system, and vice versa.) “Structural coupling” refers to the history of recurrent interactions between two or
more systems that leads to a structural congruence between them (Maturana 1975; Maturana and Varela 1987, p. 75). Thus the state changes of
an autonomous system result from its operational closure and structural
coupling. The result of any state change is always further self-organized
activity within the system, unless its closure is disrupted and it is no
46 The Enactive Approach
longer able to carry on its coupling, in which case it disintegrates. Systems described as autonomous in this sense abound throughout the
living world—single cells, microbial communities, nervous systems, immune systems, multicellular organisms, ecosystems, and so on. Such systems need to be seen as sources of their own activity, specifying their
own domains of interaction, not as transducers or functions for converting input instructions into output products. In other words, the autonomous character of these systems needs to be recognized.
The second, bottom-up approach to autonomy builds on these notions of organizational and operational closure, but tries to work out
the energetic and thermodynamic requirements for the instantiation
of “basic autonomy” in the physical world. From this perspective, basic
autonomy is “the capacity of a system to manage the flow of matter and
energy through it so that it can, at the same time, regulate, modify, and
control: (i) internal self-constructive processes and (ii) processes of exchange with the environment” (Ruiz-Mirazo and Moreno 2004, p.
240). This capacity brings with it specific and demanding physicalimplementation requirements: the system must have certain types of
components, specifically a semipermeable active boundary (a membrane), an energy transduction/conversion apparatus (an energy currency such as adenosine triphosphate (ATP) in living cells, which
transfers energy from chemical bonds to energy-absorbing reactions
within the cell), and at least one type of component that controls and
facilitates the self-construction processes (catalysts) (Ruiz-Mirazo and
Moreno 2004, p. 252).
Figure 3.1 depicts the basic autopoietic organization for a living cell.
A cell stands out of a molecular soup by creating the boundaries that
set it apart from what it is not and that actively regulate its interactions
with the environment. Metabolic processes within the cell construct
these boundaries, but the metabolic processes themselves are made
possible by those very boundaries. In this way, the cell emerges as a
figure out of a chemical background. Should this process of selfproduction be interrupted, the cellular components no longer form a
unity, gradually diffusing back into a molecular soup.
Figure 3.1 can be compared with Figure 3.2, which depicts the minimal form of organizational closure for a nervous system. Any nervous
system operates according to a basic “neurologic,” a pattern that continues and elaborates the biologic of autopoiesis. The fundamental
Autonomy and Emergence 47
Figure 3.2. Organizational closure of the nervous system.
logic of the nervous system is to couple movement and a stream of sensory activity in a continuous circular fashion (Maturana and Varela
1987, pp. 142–176). Wherever movement is essential to a multicellular
organism’s mode of life, there is the corresponding development of a
nervous system. A nervous system links sensory surfaces (sense organs
and nerve endings) and effectors (muscles, glands) within the body. In
this way it integrates the organism, holding it together as a mobile
unity, as an autonomous sensorimotor agent.
This neurologic underlies all the variations on sensorimotor coordination found in the animal kingdom. In all animals, neuronal networks establish and maintain a sensorimotor cycle through which what
the animal senses depends directly on how it moves, and how it moves
depends directly on what it senses. No animal is a mere passive respondent; every animal meets the environment on its own sensorimotor terms. Merleau-Ponty recognized this crucial point in his first
work, The Structure of Behavior:
The organism cannot properly be compared to a keyboard on which
the external stimuli would play and in which their proper form would
be delineated for the simple reason that the organism contributes to
the constitution of that form. When my hand follows each effort of a
48 The Enactive Approach
struggling animal while holding an instrument for capturing it, it is
clear that each of my movements responds to an external stimulation;
but it is also clear that these stimulations could not be received without
the movements by which I expose my receptors to their influence . . .
When the eye and the ear follow an animal in flight, it is impossible to
say “which started first” in the exchange of stimuli and responses. Since
all movements of the organism are always conditioned by external in-
fluences, one can, if one wishes, readily treat behavior as an effect of
the milieu. But in the same way, since all the stimulations which the organism receives have in turn been possible only by its preceding movements which have culminated in exposing the receptor organ to the external influences, one could also say that the behavior is the first cause
of the stimulations.
Thus the form of the excitant is created by the organism itself, by its
proper manner of offering itself to actions from outside. Doubtless, in
order to be able to subsist, it must encounter a certain number of physical and chemical agents in its surroundings. But it is the organism itself—according to the proper nature of its receptors, the thresholds of
its nerve centers and the movements of the organs—which chooses the
stimuli in the physical world to which it will be sensitive. “The environment (Umwelt) emerges from the world through the actualization or the
being of the organism—[granted that] an organism can exist only if it
succeeds in finding in the world an adequate environment.” This would
be a key board which moves itself in such a way as to offer—and according to variable rhythms—such or such of its keys to the in itself monotonous action of an external hammer. (1963, p. 13)5
This passage clearly expresses an autonomy perspective. Organisms
display patterns of behavior that require us to see them as autonomous. Varela tries to characterize this autonomy at an abstract
level in terms of a generic dynamic pattern or form, namely, organizational and operational closure. Hence Varela gives us his “Closure
Thesis,” which states, “Every autonomous system is organizationally
closed” (Varela 1979, p. 58).6
Figure 3.1 illustrates the minimal form this closure takes for life at
the single-cell level, and Figure 3.2 illustrates the minimal form it takes
for the nervous system. Whereas autopoietic closure brings forth a
minimal “bodily self” at the level of cellular metabolism, sensorimotor
Autonomy and Emergence 49
closure produces a “sensorimotor self” at the level of perception and
action. In the one case the passage from network closure to selfhood
(and correlative otherness) happens at the level of an active semipermeable boundary or membrane, which regulates interaction with the
outside environment. In the other case it happens at the level of behavior and intentional action. In both cases we see the co-emergence
of inside and outside, of selfhood and a correlative world or environment of otherness, through the generic mechanism of network closure
(autonomy) and its physical embodiment (Varela 1997a; see also
Moreno and Barandiaran 2004).7
In addition to these cellular and sensorimotor forms of selfhood,
other forms of selfhood arise from other organizationally and operationally closed systems. The immune system, for instance—understood
as an autonomous immune network that establishes a coherent somatic identity for the organism, rather than as a mere mechanism of
defense—brings forth a dynamic, somatic identity at a distributed cellular and molecular level (Coutinho 2003; Varela and Coutinho 1991).
The animate form of our living body is thus the place of intersection
for numerous emergent patterns of selfhood and coupling. Whether
cellular, somatic, sensorimotor, or neurocognitive, these patterns derive not from any homuncular self or agent inside the system organizing it or directing it, but from distributed networks with operational closure. In Varela’s image, our organism is a meshwork of
“selfless selves,” and we are and live this meshwork (Varela 1991; Varela
and Cohen 1989).
Let me forestall an objection that might arise at this point. The
nervous system is clearly embedded in the body of the organism, and
the organism in its environment (Chiel and Beer 1997). This fact
seemingly contradicts the statement that the nervous system is an autonomous system and that the organism is an autonomous agent. The
thought here would be that the operation of the nervous system loops
through the body (via sensory and motor surfaces), and therefore it is
not possible that the nervous system has operational closure (that the
product of every process within the system stays within that system).
Similarly, because the bodily activity of the organism loops through the
environment (motor activity affects the sensory stimulation one receives back from the environment), the organism cannot have an operationally closed dynamics.
50 The Enactive Approach
A number of points, both methodological and epistemological, need
to be made in reply. The first point is that, strictly speaking, system, autonomy, and heteronomy are heuristic notions—they are cognitive aids
or guides in the scientific investigation and characterization of observable phenomena and patterns of behavior. As heuristic notions, they
(implicitly) refer back to and implicate the interpretive and explanatory stance of an observer (or observer community). What counts as the
system in any given case, and hence whether it is autonomous or heteronomous, is context-dependent and interest-relative. For any system
it is always possible to adopt a heteronomy or external-control perspective, and this can be useful for many purposes. Nevertheless, this stance
does not illuminate—and indeed can obscure—certain observable patterns of behavior, namely, patterns arising from the system’s internal dynamics rather than external parameters. An organism dynamically produces and maintains its own organization as an invariant through
change, and thereby also brings forth its own domain of interaction.
(Although living organisms are paradigmatic in this regard, nothing
apparently rules out the possibility of artificial autonomy.) A heteronomy perspective does not provide an adequate framework to investigate and understand this phenomenon; an autonomy perspective is
needed.
The second point is that in any given case or for any candidate
system we need to distinguish between, on the one hand, the operation of the system as such, which is a function of both its organization
(the set of relations that defines it as a system) and physical structure,
and, on the other hand, its performance in relation to whatever wider
context in which it is observed. For example, if we wish to characterize
the organization and operation of the nervous system as a finite neuronal network, then we need to characterize the nervous system as organizationally and operationally closed, such that any change of activity in a neuron (or neural assembly) always leads to a change of
activity in other neurons (either directly through synaptic action or indirectly through intervening physical and chemical elements). Sensory and effector neurons are no exception because any change in the
one leads to changes in the other, such that the network always closes
back upon itself, regardless of intervening elements (Maturana and
Varela 1980, p. 127). Nevertheless, the domain of states available to the
nervous system (as an operationally closed network) is clearly a function of its history of interactions with the rest of the body (and the en-
Autonomy and Emergence 51
vironment). Hence, besides characterizing the nervous system’s operation as a closed network, we need to characterize its performance in its
structural coupling with the rest of the body (and the environment).
Similarly, to characterize the organism as a finite cellular or multicellular entity, we need to characterize it as an organizationally and operationally closed system. At the same time, we need to characterize the
organism’s performance or behavior in its structural coupling with the
environment.
We can also shift perspectives and characterize the nervous system as
a heteronomous system—that is, as a component system with various
functions defined in relation to the organism (such as registering sensory changes or guiding movement). Notice, however—and this is the
third point—that in so shifting perspectives we are ipso facto no longer
talking about the same system. The system with which we are now concerned is no longer the nervous system as a finite neuronal network,
but rather the larger system of the organism (in which the nervous
system is seen as a component). Similarly, we can also shift perspectives
and characterize the organism as a heteronomous system subject to
the control of the environment (for instance, other organisms). Once
again, in thus shifting perspectives we are ipso facto no longer dealing
with the same system. The system now is the larger system of organismplus-environment, not the organism as a finite cellular or multicellular
entity.8
These considerations show us that there is no inconsistency between
characterizing the nervous system and organism as autonomous and
emphasizing their somatic and environmental embeddedness. We do,
however, have to keep our logical and conceptual accounts clear, so
that we know which explanatory heuristic is in play at any given time.
In any case, for the enactive approach it is the autonomy perspective
on natural cognitive agents that remains the reference point for understanding mind and life, not a predefined input-output task strucure.
Information and Meaning
Adopting an autonomy perspective also brings with it a certain way of
thinking about semantic information or meaning. For enactive theorists, information is context-dependent and agent-relative; it belongs
to the coupling of a system and its environment. What counts as infor-
52 The Enactive Approach
mation is determined by the history, structure, and needs of the system
acting in its environment.
According to the received view in cognitive science, in order to explain cognitive abilities we need to appeal to information-bearing
states inside the system. Such states, by virtue of the semantic information they carry about the world, qualify as representations. Cognitivists
conceive of these representations as symbols in a computational “language of thought,” and connectionists as constrained patterns of network activity corresponding to phase space “attractors” (regions of
phase space toward which all nearby trajectories converge). In either
case there is a strong tendency to adopt an objectivist conception of
representation: representations are internal structures that encode
context-independent information about the world, and cognition is
the processing of such information.
This objectivist notion of information presupposes a heteronomy
perspective in which an observer or designer stands outside the system
and states what is to count as information (and hence what is to count
as error or success in representation). Information looks different
from an autonomy perspective. Here the system, on the basis of its operationally closed dynamics and mode of structural coupling with the
environment, helps determine what information is or can be.
A neurobiological example can help to illustrate these ideas.9 Certain
kinds of cortical neurons are often described as feature detectors because they respond preferentially (fire above their base rate) to various
types of stimuli, such as edges, lines, and moving spots. Such neurons
are identified by recording their individual activity with a microelectrode and determining the sensory stimulus to which the neuron is
most sensitive. Such neurons are said to “represent” features of objects
and to make that information available for futher processing by various
systems in the brain. This view lies behind the standard formulation of
the so-called binding problem. This problem concerns how distinct features (shape, color, motion), as represented by cell populations in spatially distributed and functionally segregated neural pathways, can be
bound together to form a complete and accurate representation of the
object (so that the right shapes go with the right colors and motions).
This way of thinking about the brain treats it as a heteronomous system:
object features outside the organism provide informational inputs to
the brain, and the brain’s information processing task is to arrive at an
Autonomy and Emergence 53
accurate representation of the objective world and produce an adaptive
motor output.
From an autonomy perspective, it is crucial to distinguish between information about stimuli as they are defined by an observer and information in the sense of what meanings the stimuli have for the animal.
Only the latter play a significant role in the brain’s operation. The notion of an object “feature” is defined by an observer who stands outside
the system, has independent access to the environment, and establishes
correlations between environmental features and neuronal responses.
The animal’s brain has no access to features in this sense (and a fortiori
has no access to any mapping from features to neuronal responses). As
Freeman explains, “In the view from neurodynamics, neurons that respond to edges, lines, and moving spots are manifesting the local topological properties of neuronal maps, which extract local time and space
derivatives in automatic preprocessing for spatial and temporal contrast enhancement. No objects or features are manifested at the level of
the single neuron, assuredly not those used by an observer” (Freeman
1995, p. 54). From an autonomy perspective, individual neurons do not
detect objectively defined features. Rather, assemblies of neurons make
sense of stimulation by constructing meaning, and this meaning arises
as a function of how the brain’s endogenous and nonlinear activity
compensates for sensory perturbations. From this perspective, the
feature-binding problem is not the brain’s problem, but the brain theorist’s problem; it is an artifact of a certain way of looking at the brain.
Freeman’s description of the alternative view, based on looking at the
brain as an autonomous system operating according to nonlinear
causality, is well worth quoting here:
In this view the experimenter trains a subject to co-operate through the
use of positive and negative reinforcement, thereby inducing a state of
expectancy and search for a stimulus, as it is conceived by the subject.
When the expected stimulus arrives, the activated receptors transmit
pulses to the sensory cortex, where they elicit the construction by nonlinear dynamics of a macroscopic, spatially coherent oscillatory pattern
that covers an entire area of sensory cortex . . . It is observed by means
of the electroencephalogram (EEG) from electrode arrays on all the
sensory cortices . . . It is not seen in recordings from single neuron action potentials, because the fraction of the variance in the single neu-
54 The Enactive Approach
ronal pulse train that is covariant with the neural mass is far too small,
on the order of 0.1 percent.
The emergent pattern is not a representation of a stimulus . . . It is a
state transition that is induced by a stimulus, followed by a construction
of a pattern that is shaped by the synaptic modification among cortical
neurons from prior learning. It is also dependent on the brain stem nuclei that bathe the forebrain in neuromodulatory chemicals. It is a dynamic action pattern that creates and carries the meaning of the stimulus for the subject. It reflects the individual history, present context,
and expectancy, corresponding to the unity and wholeness of intentionality. Owing to dependence on history, the patterns created in each
cortex are unique to each subject. (Freeman 1999b, pp. 149–150)
The distinction between autonomous meaning-construction and
heteronomous information processing needs to be placed in the
broader context of the embodied dynamicist way of thinking about information. To explain this way of thinking, it will be helpful to go back
to ideas introduced by Howard Pattee (1977). Pattee made an important distinction between two modes of description of a complex
system—the linguistic mode, which describes the system in terms of discrete, rate-independent, symbolic elements, and the dynamical mode,
which describes the system in terms of continuous, rate-dependent
processes, and thus explicitly includes the flow of time. Pattee raised
the following question: “How do we know we are not intepreting certain structures as descriptions, only because we recognize them as consistent with rules of one of our own languages?” (1977, p. 262). In
other words, how do we know our linguistic descriptions are not simply
observer-relative, but rather correspond to symbolic structures that belong to the system itself and play a role in its operation? And he answered: “we must further restrict our model of a complex system to remove the case of the external observer reading a message that is not
really in the system itself. This restriction is achieved by requiring that
a complex system must read and write its own messages” (1977, p.
262).
Pattee’s example is a living cell. When we describe DNA triplets as
“coding for” amino acids, we employ the linguistic mode of description. Which amino acid a given DNA triplet specifies is supposed to be
rate-independent—it does not matter how fast the triplet is “read” in
Autonomy and Emergence 55
the course of protein synthesis. It is also supposed to be arbitrary, in
the sense that “[i]t is hard to see why a code in which GGC means
glycine and AAG means lycine is either better or worse than one in
which the meanings are reservsed” (Maynard Smith 1986, p. 19). According to Pattee, the linguistic mode of description in this case is not
observer-relative because the cell is a self-describing system that “reads
and writes its own messages.” The writing of its own messages corresponds to DNA replication (the production of a complement of the
original DNA molecule through a template); the reading of its own
messages corresponds to protein synthesis (DNA “transcription” to
RNA and RNA “translation” to protein).
Pattee then makes a number of crucial points. First, for the code to
be read there must ultimately be a transduction or conversion within
the cell from the linguistic mode to the dynamical mode. This conversion occurs when the rate-independent linear array of amino acids
folds to become a three-dimensional enzyme. Within the life cycle of
the cell, there is thus a transformation from the enzyme as something
designated in the genome to the enzyme as an operational component
of metabolism. Second, this transformation (the protein folding) is
not itself linguistically described in the cell, but rather happens according to physical law (under the higher-order constraint of the
DNA-specificed amino acid sequence). Third, if the transformation
were linguistically described, the speed and precision with which it is
accomplished would be considerably compromised. Pattee’s conclusion is that “we would not expect a complete formal description or simulation of a complex system to adapt or function as rapidly or reliably
as the partially self-describing, tacit dynamic system it simulates” (1977,
p. 264).
Pattee emphasizes the complementarity of the linguistic and dynamical modes of description, but also suggests that symbolic information emerges from and acts as a constraint on dynamics. This idea
is important for embodied dynamicism and the enactive approach.
Let us return to the example of the cell. In general, nucleotide
triplets are capable of predictably specifying an amino acid if and only
if they are properly embedded in the cell’s metabolism, that is, in a
multitude of enyzmatic regulations in a complex biochemical network. This network has a chicken-and-egg character at several levels.
First, proteins can arise only from a DNA/RNA “reading” process, but
56 The Enactive Approach
this process cannot happen without proteins. Second, the DNA
“writing” and “reading” processes must be properly situated within
the intracellular environment, but this environment is a result of
those very processes. Finally, the entire cell is an autopoietic system—
that is, an autonomous system defined by an operationally closed network of molecular processes that simultaneously both produces and
realizes the cell concretely in the physical space of its biochemical
components.
Now, when we employ the linguistic mode of description and state
that DNA/RNA “codes” for proteins, we restrict our focus to one particular sequence of this overall circular causality. We abstract away
from the many intervening and necessary causal steps in the actual dynamic process of protein synthesis, and we bracket out the essential
participation of many other molecular elements (such as RNA polymerase enzymes, and positive and negative regulatory proteins). We
“thus reduce our description to a skeleton that associates a certain part
of a nucleic acid with a certain protein segment. Next we observe that
this kind of simplified description of an actual dynamic process is a
useful one in following the sequences of reproductive steps from one
generation to the other, to the extent that the dynamic process stays
stable (i.e., the kinds of dynamics responsible for bonding, folding,
and so on) . . . A symbolic explanation, such as the description of some
cellular components as genes, betrays the emergence of certain coherent patterns of behavior to which we choose to pay attention” (Varela 1979,
p. 75). It is the emergence of such coherent dynamic patterns that underwrites the symbolic informational level of description: “An object
or event is a symbol only if it is a token for an abbreviated nomic chain
that occurs within the bounds of the system’s organizational closure. In other
words, whenever the system’s closure determines certain regularities
in the face of internal or external interactions and perturbations, such
regularities can be abbreviated as a symbol, usually the initial or terminal element in the nomic chain” (Varela 1979, pp. 79–80). Thus,
when we talk about DNA “coding” for proteins we are not referring to
a special type of symbolic causal relation or a special type of intrinsically informational molecule that rises above the dynamic fray. Rather,
we are abbreviating a lengthy but remarkably stable dynamic pattern
of biochemical events. It is precisely the stability and predictability of
the entire pattern that allows us to telescope it in a linguistic mode of
Autonomy and Emergence 57
description by treating nucleotide triplets as in effect “standing for”
amino acids.
This mode of description is unobjectionable (and has heuristic
value) as long as it is remembered that the genetic code is no more
than a rule of causal specificity based on the fact that cells use nucleic
acids as templates for the primary structure (amino acid sequence) of
proteins (Godfrey-Smith 2000b; Thompson 1997). Yet it is unacceptable to say that DNA contains the information for phenotypic design,
because this statement attributes an intrinsic semantic-informational
status to one particular type of component and thereby divests this
component of its necessary embedding in the dynamics of the autopoietic network. It is this network in its entirety that specifies the
phenotypic characteristics of a cell, not one of its components, and it is
this network as a whole that serves as the precondition and causal basis
of DNA replication (“writing”) and protein synthesis (“reading”) (see
Moss 1992). Information is not intrinsic to the static linear array of the
DNA sequence, but is rather dynamically constituted in and by the cell
as an autopoietically organized, three-dimensional entity—by the cell
as a body. In summary, the linguistic mode is emergent from the dynamical mode, and information exists only as dynamically embodied.
With these points having been made, we return to the difference between autonomous meaning-construction and heteronomous information processing. Information is formed within a context rather than
imposed from without. Gregory Bateson used to say, “information is a
difference that makes a difference” (Bateson 1972, p. 315). We could
elaborate this insight by saying that information, dynamically conceived, is the making of a difference that makes a difference for somebody somewhere (see Oyama 2000b). Information here is understood
in the sense of informare, to form within (Varela 1979, p. 266). An autonomous system becomes informed by virtue of the meaning formation in which it participates, and this meaning formation depends on
the way its endogenous dynamics specifies things that make a difference to it (Kelso and Kay 1987; Turvey and Shaw 1999).
For another example we can return to the finger coordination study
of Haken, Kelso, and Bunz (1985). There the switching from in-phase
to anti-phase happens without any command from a motor program;
rather, it occurs spontaneously as an emergent property of the system’s
self-organizing dynamics. The collective variable or order parameter
58 The Enactive Approach
of relative phase is informational in the sense that it specifies coherent
patterns or relations that inform the system and that can be physically
or physiologically realized in multiple ways. As Kelso explains:
Instead of treating dynamics as ordinary physics using standard biophysical quantities such as mass, length, momentum, and energy, our coordination or pattern dynamics is informational from the very start. The order
parameter, f [relative phase], captures the coherent relations among
different kinds of things. Unlike ordinary physics, the pattern dynamics
is context dependent: the dynamics are valid for a given biological function or task, but largely independent of how this function is physiologically implemented. Thus, if we accept that the same order parameter, f,
captures coherent spatiotemporal relations among different kinds of
things, and the same equations of motion describe how different coordination patterns form, coexist, and change, it seems justified to conclude that order parameters in biological systems are functionally specific, context-sensitive informational variables; and that the coordination
dynamics are more general than the particular structures that instantiate them.
Notice, coordination dynamics is not trapped (like ordinary physics)
by its (purely formal) syntax. Order parameters are semantic, relational
quantities that are intrinsically meaningful to system functioning. What
could be more meaningful to an organism than information that speci-
fies the coordinative relations among its parts or between itself and the
environment? This view turns the mind-matter, information-dynamics
interaction on its head. Instead of treating dynamics as ordinary physics
and information as a symbolic code acting in the way that a program relates to a computer, dynamics is cast in terms that are semantically
meaningful. (Kelso 1995, p. 145)
Let me connect these points to the autonomy perspective. As we
have seen, from the autonomy perspective a natural cognitive agent—
an organism, animal, or person—does not process information in a
context-independent sense. Rather, it brings forth or enacts meaning
in structural coupling with its environment. The meanings of an autonomous system’s states are formed within (informare) the context of
the system’s dynamics and structural coupling. Therefore, if we wish to
continue using the term representation, then we need to be aware of
Autonomy and Emergence 59
what sense this term can have for the enactive approach. Representational “vehicles” (the structures or processes that embody meaning)
are temporally extended patterns of activity that can crisscross the
brain-body-world boundaries, and the meanings or contents they embody are brought forth or enacted in the context of the system’s structural coupling with its environment.
Another way to make this point would be to say that autonomous systems do not operate on the basis of internal representations in the subjectivist/objectivist sense. Instead of internally representing an external world in some Cartesian sense, they enact an environment
inseparable from their own structure and actions (Varela, Thompson,
and Rosch 1991, p. 140). In phenomenological language, they constitute (disclose) a world that bears the stamp of their own structure. As
Merleau-Ponty puts it, quoting Goldstein, in the passage cited earlier:
“the environment emerges from the world through the being or actualization of the organism.” In the case of animal life, the environment
emerges as a sensorimotor world through the actualization of the organism as a sensorimotor being. The organism is a sensorimotor being
thanks to its nervous system. The nervous system connects anatomically distant sensory and motor processes, subsuming them in operationally closed sensorimotor networks. Through their coherent, largescale patterns of activity these networks establish a sensorimotor
identity for the animal—a sensorimotor self. In the same stroke, they
specify what counts as “other,” namely, the animal’s sensorimotor
world.
This idea of a sensorimotor world—a body-oriented world of perception and action—is none other than von Uexküll’s original notion
of an Umwelt. An Umwelt is an animal’s environment in the sense of its
lived, phenomenal world, the world as it presents itself to that animal
thanks to its sensorimotor repertoire: “all that a subject perceives becomes his perceptual world and all that he does, his effector-world.
Perceptual and effector worlds together form a closed unit, the
Umwelt” (von Uexküll 1957, p. 6). The logic of this co-emergence is
depicted in Figure 3.3.
In this figure, information is the intentional relation of the system to
its milieu, established on the basis of the system’s autonomy (organizational-operational closure). One of the main scientific tasks for embodied dynamicism and the enactive approach is to explain how the
60 The Enactive Approach
Figure 3.3. Co-emergence of autonomous selfhood and world.
pattern dynamics of brain, body, and behavior are informational in
this sense (see Kelso 1995, p. 288).
Emergent Processes
Another key idea of the enactive approach that needs elaboration here
is the idea of emergence or emergent processes. In complex systems theory,
an emergent process is one that results from collective selforganization. An emergent process belongs to an ensemble or network
of elements, arises spontaneously or self-organizes from the locally de-
fined and globally constrained or controlled interactions of those elements, and does not belong to any single element. The enactive approach builds on this notion of emergence but reformulates it as
“dynamic co-emergence,” in which part and whole co-emerge and mutually specify each other.
Let me first introduce emergence in the complex systems sense. A
standard example of this kind of emergence is the formation of “Bé-
Autonomy and Emergence 61
nard cells,” a dynamic geometrical pattern of fluid flow, in liquids or
gases subject to an imposed temperature gradient (see Kelso 1995, pp.
7–8; Solé and Goodwin 2000, pp. 13–17). The emergence of Bénard
cells can be seen in the behavior of cooking oil in a frying pan. Applying heat to the pan increases the temperature difference between
the cooler layer of oil at the top and the hotter layer of oil at the
bottom. When the temperature difference between top and bottom is
small, there is no large-scale or global motion of the oil, but eventually
when the difference becomes large enough instability occurs and the
liquid starts to roll in an orderly fashion known as convection rolls. In
other words, the system undergoes a state transition, described mathematically as a bifurcation, as the new self-organizing behavior and spatial structures of convection rolls emerge. As the temperature gradient
is increased still further, the convection rolls undergo another transition or bifurcation and give rise to an array of hexagonal up-and-down
flow patterns called Bénard cells.
This example illustrates several basic points about collective selforganization and dynamic emergence. The temperature gradient is
the control parameter for the transitions or bifurcations. It leads the
system through a variety of possible states but does not dictate, prescribe, or code for the emerging flow patterns. Nor is there any homunculus or program inside the system determining those patterns.
In Kelso’s words: “Such spontaneous pattern formation is exactly what
we mean by self-organization: the system organizes itself, but there is
no ‘self,’ no agent inside the system doing the organizing” (Kelso
1995, p. 8). The order parameter of the system is the amplitude of the
convection rolls. It is created by the interactions of the fluid molecules, but at the same time it governs or constrains their behavior by
drastically reducing the immense number of degrees of freedom of
motion that the individual molecules would otherwise have.
Emergence through collective self-organization thus has two aspects. One is local-to-global determination, as a result of which novel
macrolevel structures and processes emerge. The other is global-tolocal determination whereby global structures and processes constrain
local interactions. These global-to-local influences do not take the
same form as the local-to-global ones: they typically manifest themselves through changes in control parameters (the temperature gradient in the example above) and boundary conditions rather than
62 The Enactive Approach
through changes to the individual elements (the fluid molecules). Coherent and ordered global behaviors, which are described by collective
variables or order parameters, constrain or govern the behavior of the
individual components, entraining them so that they no longer have
the same behavioral alternatives open to them as they would if they
were not interdependently woven into the coherent and ordered
global pattern. At the same time, the behavior of the components generates and sustains the global order. This two-sided or double determination is known as circular causality (Haken 1983).
Emergence and circular causality are crucially important in the context of neurodynamics. Neuroscience indicates that cognition, emotion, and action require the transient integration of numerous, widely
distributed, and constantly interacting brain regions and areas. An
outstanding question for neuroscience today is to determine the
mechanisms of this large-scale integration. From a dynamic-systems
perspective, large-scale integration corresponds to the formation of
transient dynamic links between widespread neural populations
(Varela et al. 2001). On the one hand, large-scale dynamic patterns
emerge from distributed local neuronal activities. On the other hand,
large-scale patterns constrain these local activities. According to a
number of theorists, dynamic instability or metastability is crucial to
large-scale integration because it permits a flexible repertoire of global
states without the system becoming trapped in any one particular
state.10
Emergence and circular causality can also be illustrated by neurodynamical studies of epilepsy (Thompson and Varela 2001). Focal
epileptic seizures originate in specific parts of the cortex; they can remain confined to those areas or spread to other parts of the brain.
Their clinical manifestations depend on the cortical area in which they
originate, how widely they spread, and how long they last. Local
epileptic activity can modify the subject’s mental competencies and
give rise to various kinds of mental experiences, such as visual or auditory illusions and hallucinations, and memory phenomena involving
the vivid actual recall of a past event or déjà-vu illusions. These mental
phenomena can also be induced by direct electrical stimulation of the
temporal lobe in epileptic patients, as classically described by Wilder
Penfield (1938). Thus local neuronal activity at the level of an epileptogenic zone can produce large-scale effects, eventually influencing
Autonomy and Emergence 63
the global level of a moment of consciousness. This is a case of local-toglobal emergence in the brain.
The converse—global-to-local influence—though less documented
and more controversial, seems also to be the case. The basic idea is
that cognitive activity, which reflects large-scale integration in the
brain, can affect local activity. For example, the subject can voluntarily
affect local epileptic activity, as indicated by numerous patient reports
and a few clinically reported cases (see Le Van Quyen and Petitmengin
2002). As long ago as 1954, Penfield and Jasper described the blocking
of a parietal seizure by the initiation of a complex mathematical calculation (Penfield and Jasper 1954), and recently more extensive observations have confirmed such cognitive influences (Schmid-Schonbein
1998). We can assume that such intervention is possible because the
epileptogenic zones are embedded in a complex network of other
brain regions that actively participate in the large-scale integration underlying cognitive acts. It also seems reasonable to assume that these
global patterns of integration can influence local events, including
eventually the local epileptogenic zones, whose activity can thus be
taken as an indication of the global influence.
Experimental work by Michel Le Van Quyen, Francisco Varela, and
their colleagues provides evidence for such global-to-local influence in
the case of a patient with an unusually focal and stable occipitotemporal epileptic discharge.11 This patient showed no evidence of cognitive impairment and was willing to participate in simple cognitive tasks
of visual and auditory discrimination. For the visual task, he was asked
to press a button when the target stimulus appeared, but not when the
two other nontarget stimuli were shown. The temporal intervals between successive discharges of the epileptic spike pattern were analyzed. Dynamical inspection (in the form of a phase space known as a
first-return map) showed that the distribution of the intervals followed
a particular kind of unstable dynamic pattern. The spikes displayed a
distinct periodic activity for a short time before they diverged away
along another unstable direction, a kind of dynamic pattern known as
an unstable periodic orbit. Furthermore, this activity covaried with the
specific mental state of the patient during the perceptual task and appeared to be modulated by the gamma frequency (30–70 Hertz) activity associated with his cognitive states. (Gamma frequency activity is
widely reported to be associated with a variety of cognitive processes,
64 The Enactive Approach
including attention, perception, and memory.) These findings suggest
that the patient’s act of perception contributed in a highly specific way
to “pulling” the epileptic activities toward particular unstable periodic
orbits. Such global-to-local influence mobilized by cognitive activity
might open up possibilities for cognitive strategies of control of
epileptic seizures (Le Van Quyen and Petitmengin 2002).
Let me conclude this chapter by linking these ideas about circular
causality and emergence back to autonomy. An autonomy perspective
brings with it a certain way of thinking about emergence. What
emerges in the case of an autonomous system such as a cell is a selfproducing entity that also brings forth its own domain of interactions
(see Figure 3.3). This sort of emergence takes a major step beyond dynamic pattern formation in physical dissipative systems:
[A]lthough the phenomenon of self-organization always involves the
generation and maintenance of a global (or high-level) pattern or correlation that constrains the (low-level) dynamics of the components of
the system, in standard dissipative structures this occurs only provided
that the system is put under the appropriate boundary conditions. If
those (externally controlled) conditions are changed (in particular, if
the input of matter or energy is outside a certain range), the selforganizing dynamic vanishes. Therefore, there is an important difference between the typical examples of “spontaneous” dissipative structures and real autonomous systems: in the former case, the flow of
energy and/or matter that keeps the system away from equilibrium is
not controlled by the organization of the system (the key boundary conditions are externally established, either by the scientist in the lab or by
some natural phenomenon that is not causally dependent on the selforganizing one), whereas in the latter case, the constraints that actually
guide energy/matter flows from the environment through the constitutive processes of the system are endogenously created and maintained.
(Ruiz-Mirazo and Moreno 2004, p. 238)
An autonomous system, such as a cell or multicellular organism, is
not merely self-maintaining, like a candle flame; it is also selfproducing and thus produces its own self-maintaining processes, including an active topological boundary that demarcates inside from
outside and actively regulates interaction with the environment. In the
single-cell, autopoietic form of autonomy, a membrane-bounded,
Autonomy and Emergence 65
metabolic network produces the metabolites that constitute both the
network itself and the membrane that permits the network’s bounded
dynamics. Other autonomous systems have different sorts of selfconstructing processes and network topologies. Whether the system is
a cell, immune network, nervous system, insect colony, or animal society, what emerges is a unity with its own self-producing identity and
domain of interactions or milieu, be it cellular (autopoiesis), somatic
(immune networks), sensorimotor and neurocognitive (the nervous
system), or social (animal societies).
Dynamic co-emergence best describes the sort of emergence we see
in autonomy. In an autonomous system, the whole not only arises
from the (organizational closure of) the parts, but the parts also arise
from the whole.12 The whole is constituted by the relations of the
parts, and the parts are constituted by the relations they bear to one
another in the whole. Hence, the parts do not exist in advance, prior
to the whole, as independent entities that retain their identity in the
whole. Rather, part and whole co-emerge and mutually specify each
other.
Biological life, seen from the perspective of autopoiesis, provides a
paradigm case of dynamic co-emergence. A minimal autopoietic whole
emerges from the dynamic interdependence of a membrane boundary
and an internal chemical reaction network. The membrane and reaction network (as well as the molecules that compose them) do not preexist as independent entities. Rather, they co-emerge through their integrative, metabolic relation to each other. They produce and constitute
the whole, while the whole produces them and subordinates them to it.
We will come back to this paradigm case of dynamic co-emergence in
Part II.
